 _Chapter 5_
 A Conspiracy Unmasked
 'Now we had better get home ourselves,' said Merry. There's something
funny about all this, I see; but it must wait till we get in.'
 They turned down the Ferry lane, which was straight and well-kept and
edged with large white-washed stones. In a hundred yards or so it brought them
to the river-bank, where there was a broad wooden landing-stage. A large flat
ferry-boat was moored beside it. The white bollards near the water's edge
glimmered in the light of two lamps on high posts. Behind them the mists in
the flat fields were now above the hedges; but the water before them was dark,
with only a few curling wisps like steam among the reeds by the bank. There
seemed to be less fog on the further side.
 Merry led the pony over a gangway on to the ferry, and the others
followed. Merry then pushed slowly off with a long pole. The Brandywine flowed
slow and broad before them. On the other side the bank was steep, and up it a
winding path climbed from the further landing. Lamps were twinkling there.
Behind loomed up the Buck Hill; and out of it, through stray shrouds of mist,
shone many round windows, yellow and red. They were the windows of Brandy
Hall, the ancient home of the Brandybucks.
 Long ago Gorhendad Oldbuck, head of the Oldbuck family, one of the oldest
in the Marish or indeed in the Shire, had crossed the river, which was the
original boundary of the land eastwards. He built (and excavated) Brandy Hall,
changed his name to Brandybuck, and settled down to become master of what was
virtually a small independent country. His family grew and grew, and after his
days continued to grow, until Brandy Hall occupied the whole of the low hill,
and had three large front-doors, many side-doors, and about a hundred windows.
The Brandybucks and their numerous dependants then began to burrow, and later
to build, all round about. That was the origin of Buckland, a thickly
inhabited strip between the river and the Old Forest, a sort of colony from
the Shire. Its chief village was Bucklebury, clustering in the banks and
slopes behind Brandy Hall.
 The people in the Marish were friendly with the Bucklanders, and the
authority of the Master of the Hall (as the head of the Brandybuck family was
called) was still acknowledged by the farmers between Stock and Rushey. But
most of the folk of the old Shire regarded the Bucklanders as peculiar, half
foreigners as it were. Though, as a matter of fact, they were not very
different from the other hobbits of the Four Farthings. Except in one point:
they were fond of boats, and some of them could swim.
 Their land was originally unprotected from the East; but on that side
they had built a hedge: the High Hay. It had been planted many generations
ago, and was now thick and tail, for it was constantly tended. It ran all the
way from Brandywine Bridge, in a big loop curving away from the river, to
Haysend (where the Withywindle flowed out of the Forest into the Brandywine):
well over twenty miles from end to end. But, of course, it was not a complete
protection. The Forest drew close to the hedge in many places. The Bucklanders
kept their doors locked after dark, and that also was not usual in the Shire.
 The ferry-boat moved slowly across the water. The Buckland shore drew
nearer. Sam was the only member of the party who had not been over the river
before. He had a strange feeling as the slow gurgling stream slipped by: his
old life lay behind in the mists, dark adventure lay in front. He scratched
his head, and for a moment had a passing wish that Mr. Frodo could have gone
on living quietly at Bag End.
 The four hobbits stepped off the ferry. Merry was tying it up, and Pippin
was already leading the pony up the path, when Sam (who had been looking back,
as if to take farewell of the Shire) said in a hoarse whisper:
 'Look back, Mr. Frodo! Do you see anything?'
 On the far stage, under the distant lamps, they could just make out a
figure: it looked like a dark black bundle left behind. But as they looked it
seemed to move and sway this way and that, as if searching the ground. It then
crawled, or went crouching, back into the gloom beyond the lamps.
 'What in the Shire is that?' exclaimed Merry.
 'Something that is following us,' said Frodo. 'But don't ask any more
now! Let's get away at once!' They hurried up the path to the top of the bank,
but when they looked back the far shore was shrouded in mist, and nothing
could be seen.
 'Thank goodness you don't keep any boats on the west-bank!' said Frodo.
'Can horses cross the river?'
 'They can go twenty miles north to Brandywine Bridge – or they might
swim,' answered Merry. 'Though I never heard of any horse swimming the
Brandywine. But what have horses to do with it?' I'll tell you later. Let's
get indoors and then we can talk.'
 'All right! You and Pippin know your way; so I'll just ride on and tell
Fatty Bolger that you are coming. We'll see about supper and things.'
 'We had our supper early with Farmer Maggot,' said Frodo; 'but we could
do with another.'
 'You shall have it! Give me that basket!' said Merry, and rode ahead into
the darkness.
 It was some distance from the Brandywine to Frodo's new house at
Crickhollow. They passed Buck Hill and Brandy Hall on their left, and on the
outskirts of Bucklebury struck the main road of Buckland that ran south from
the Bridge. Half a mile northward along this they came to a lane opening on
their right. This they followed for a couple of miles as it climbed up and
down into the country.
 At last they came to a narrow gate in a thick hedge. Nothing could be
seen of the house in the dark: it stood back from the lane in the middle of a
wide circle of lawn surrounded by a belt of low trees inside the outer hedge.
Frodo had chosen it, because it stood in an out-of-the-way corner of the
country, and there were no other dwellings close by. You could get in and out
without being noticed. It had been built a long while before by the
Brandybucks, for the use of guests, or members of the family that wished to
escape from the crowded life of Brandy Hall for a time. It was an oldfashioned countrified house, as
much like a hobbit-hole as possible: it was
long and low, with no upper storey; and it had a roof of turf, round windows,
and a large round door.
 As they walked lip the green path from the gate no light was visible; the
windows were dark and shuttered. Frodo knocked on the door, and Fatty Bolger
opened it. A friendly light streamed out. They slipped in quickly and shut
themselves and the light inside. They were in a wide hall with doors on either
side; in front of them a passage ran back down the middle of the house.
 'Well, what do you think of it?' asked Merry coming up the passage. 'We
have done our best in a short time to make it look like home. After all Fatty
and I only got here with the last cart-load yesterday.'
 Frodo looked round. It did look like home. Many of his own favourite
things – or Bilbo's things (they reminded him sharply of him in their new
selling) – were arranged as nearly as possible as they had been at Bag End. It
was a pleasant, comfortable, welcoming place; and he found himself wishing
that he was really coming here to settle down in quiet retirement. It seemed
unfair to have put his friends to all this trouble; and he wondered again how
he was going to break the news to them that he must leave them so soon, indeed
at once. Yet that would have to be done that very night, before they all went
to bed.
 'It's delightful!' he said with an effort. 'I hardly feel that I have
moved at all.'
 The travellers hung up their cloaks, and piled their packs on the floor.
Merry led them down the passage and threw open a door at the far end.
Firelight came out, and a puff of steam.
 'A bath!' cried Pippin. 'O blessed Meriadoc!'
 'Which order shall we go in?' said Frodo. 'Eldest first, or quickest
first? You'll be last either way, Master Peregrin.'
 'Trust me to arrange things better than that!' said Merry. 'We can't
begin life at Crickhollow with a quarrel over baths. In that room there are
_three_ tubs, and a copper full of boiling water. There are also towels, mats
and soap. Get inside, and be quick!'
 Merry and Fatty went into the kitchen on the other side of the passage,
and busied themselves with the final preparations for a late supper. Snatches
of competing songs came from the bathroom mixed with the sound of splashing
and wallowing. The voice of Pippin was suddenly lifted up above the others in
one of Bilbo's favourite bath-songs.
 Sing hey! for the bath at close of day
 that washes the weary mud away!
 A loon is he that will not sing:
 O! Water Hot is a noble thing!
 O! Sweet is the sound of falling rain,
 and the brook that leaps from hill to plain;
 but better than rain or rippling streams
 is Water Hot that smokes and steams.
 O! Water cold we may pour at need
 down a thirsty throat and be glad indeed;
 but better is Beer, if drink we lack,
 and Water Hot poured down the back.
 O! Water is fair that leaps on high
 in a fountain white beneath the sky;
 but never did fountain sound so sweet
 as splashing Hot Water with my feet!
 There was a terrific splash, and a shout of _Whoa!_ from Frodo. It
appeared that a lot of Pippin's bath had imitated a fountain and leaped on
high.
 Merry went to the door: 'What about supper and beer in the throat?' he
called. Frodo came out drying his hair.
 'There's so much water in the air that I'm coming into the kitchen to
finish,' he said.
 'Lawks!' said Merry, looking in. The stone floor was swimming. 'You ought
to mop all that up before you get anything to eat. Peregrin,' he said. 'Hurry
up, or we shan't wait for you.'
 They had supper in the kitchen on a table near the fire. 'I suppose you
three won't want mushrooms again?' said Fredegar without much hope.
 'Yes we shall!' cried Pippin.
 'They're mine!' said Frodo. 'Given to _me_ by Mrs. Maggot, a queen among
farmers' wives. Take your greedy hands away, and I'll serve them.'
 Hobbits have a passion for mushrooms, surpassing even the greediest
likings of Big People. A fact which partly explains young Frodo's long
expeditions to the renowned fields of the Marish, and the wrath of the injured
Maggot. On this occasion there was plenty for all, even according to hobbit
standards. There were also many other things to follow, and when they had
finished even Fatty Bolger heaved a sigh of content. They pushed back the
table, and drew chairs round the fire.
 'We'll clear up later,' said Merry. 'Now tell me all about it! I guess
that you have been having adventures, which was not quite fair without me. I
want a full account; and most of all I want to know what was the matter with
old Maggot, and why he spoke to me like that. He sounded almost as if he was
_scared,_ if that is possible.'
 'We have all been scared,' said Pippin after a pause, in which Frodo
stared at the fire and did not speak. 'You would have been, too, if you had
been chased for two days by Black Riders.'
 'And what are they?'
 'Black figures riding on black horses,' answered Pippin. 'If Frodo won't
talk, I will tell you the whole tale from the beginning.' He then gave a full
account of their journey from the time when they left Hobbiton. Sam gave
various supporting nods and exclamations. Frodo remained silent.
 'I should think you were making it all up,' said Merry, 'if I had not
seen that black shape on the landing-stage – and heard the queer sound in
Maggot's voice. What do you make of it all, Frodo?'
 'Cousin Frodo has been very close,' said Pippin. 'But the time has come
for him to open out. So far we have been given nothing more to go on than
Farmer Maggot's guess that it has something to do with old Bilbo's treasure.'
 'That was only a guess,' said Frodo hastily. 'Maggot does not
_know_anything.'
 'Old Maggot is a shrewd fellow,' said Merry. 'A lot goes on behind his
round face that does not come out in his talk. I've heard that he used to go
into the Old Forest at one time, and he has the reputation of knowing a good
many strange things. But you can at least tell us, Frodo, whether you think
his guess good or bad.'
 'I _think,'_ answered Frodo slowly, 'that it was a good guess, as far as
it goes. There _is a_ connexion with Bilbo's old adventures, and the Riders
are looking, or perhaps one ought to say _searching,_ for him or for me. I
also fear, if you want to know, that it is no joke at all; and that I am not
safe here or anywhere else.' He looked round at the windows and walls, as if
he was afraid they would suddenly give way. The others looked at him in
silence, and exchanged meaning glances among themselves.
 'It's coming out in a minute,' whispered Pippin to Merry. Merry nodded.
 'Well!' said Frodo at last, sitting up and straightening his back, as if
he had made a decision. 'I can't keep it dark any longer. I have got something
to tell you all. But I don't know quite how to begin.'
 'I think I could help you,' said Merry quietly, 'by telling you some of
it myself.'
 'What do you mean?' said Frodo, looking at him anxiously. 'Just this, my
dear old Frodo: you are miserable, because you don't know how to say good-bye.
You meant to leave the Shire, of course. But danger has come on you sooner
than you expected, and now you are making up your mind to go at once. And you
don't want to. We are very sorry for you.'
 Frodo opened his mouth and shut it again. His look of surprise was so
comical that they laughed. 'Dear old Frodo!' said Pippin. 'Did you really
think you had thrown dust in all our eyes? You have not been nearly careful or
clever enough for that! You have obviously been planning to go and saying
farewell to all your haunts all this year since April. We have constantly
heard you muttering: "Shall I ever look down into that valley again, I
wonder", and things like that. And pretending that you had come to the end of
your money, and actually selling your beloved Bag End to those SackvilleBagginses! And all those close
talks with Gandalf.'
 'Good heavens!' said Frodo. 'I thought I had been both careful and
clever. I don't know what Gandalf would say. Is all the Shire discussing my
departure then?'
 'Oh no!' said Merry. 'Don't worry about that! The secret won't keep for
long, of course; but at present it is, I think, only known to us conspirators.
After all, you must remember that we know you well, and are often with you. We
can usually guess what you are thinking. I knew Bilbo, too. To tell you the
truth, I had been watching you rather closely ever since he left. I thought
you would go after him sooner or later; indeed I expected you to go sooner,
and lately we have been very anxious. We have been terrified that you might
give us the slip, and go off suddenly, all on your own like he did. Ever since
this spring we have kept our eyes open, and done a good deal of planning on
our own account. You are not going to escape so easily!'
 'But I must go,' said Frodo. 'It cannot be helped, dear friends. It is
wretched for us all, but it is no use your trying to keep me. Since you have
guessed so much, please help me and do not hinder me!'
 'You do not understand!' said Pippin. 'You must go – and therefore we
must, too. Merry and I are coming with you. Sam is an excellent fellow, and
would jump down a dragon's throat to save you, if he did not trip over his own
feet; but you will need more than one companion in your dangerous adventure.'
 'My dear and most beloved hobbits!' said Frodo deeply moved. 'But I could
not allow it. I decided that long ago, too. You speak of danger, but you do
not understand. This is no treasure-hunt, no there-and-back journey. I am
flying from deadly peril into deadly peril.'
 'Of course we understand,' said Merry firmly. 'That is why we have
decided to come. We know the Ring is no laughing-matter; but we are going to
do our best to help you against the Enemy.'
 'The Ring!' said Frodo, now completely amazed.
 'Yes, the Ring,' said Merry. 'My dear old hobbit, you don't allow for the
inquisitiveness of friends. I have known about the existence of the Ring for
years – before Bilbo went away, in fact; but since he obviously regarded it as
secret, I kept the knowledge in my head, until we formed our conspiracy. I did
not know Bilbo, of course, as well as I know you; I was too young, and he was
also more careful – but he was not careful enough. If you want to know how I
first found out, I will tell you.'
 'Go on!' said Frodo faintly.
 'It was the Sackville-Bagginses that were his downfall, as you might
expect. One day, a year before the Party, I happened to be walking along the
road, when I saw Bilbo ahead. Suddenly in the distance the S.-B.s appeared,
coming towards us. Bilbo slowed down, and then hey presto! he vanished. I was
so startled that I hardly had the wits to hide myself in a more ordinary
fashion; but I got through the hedge and walked along the field inside. I was
peeping through into the road, after the S.-B.s had passed, and was looking
straight at Bilbo when he suddenly reappeared. I caught a glint of gold as he
put something back in his trouser-pocket.
 'After that I kept my eyes open. In fact, I confess that I spied. But you
must admit that it was very intriguing, and I was only in my teens. I must be
the only one in the Shire, besides you Frodo, that has ever seen the old
fellow's secret book.'
 'You have read his book!' cried Frodo. 'Good heavens above! Is nothing
safe?'
 'Not too safe, I should say,' said Merry. 'But I have only had one rapid
glance, and that was difficult to get. He never left the book about. I wonder
what became of it. I should like another look. Have you got it, Frodo?'
 'No. It was not at Bag End. He must have taken it away.'
 'Well, as I was saying,' Merry proceeded, 'I kept my knowledge to myself,
till this Spring when things got serious. Then we formed our conspiracy; and
as we were serious, too, and meant business, we have not been too scrupulous.
You are not a very easy nut to crack, and Gandalf is worse. But if you want to
be introduced to our chief investigator, I can produce him.'
 'Where is he?' said Frodo, looking round, as if he expected a masked and
sinister figure to come out of a cupboard.
 'Step forward, Sam!' said Merry; and Sam stood up with a face scarlet up
to the ears. 'Here's our collector of information! And he collected a lot, I
can tell you, before he was finally caught. After which, I may say, he seemed
to regard himself as on parole, and dried up.'
 'Sam!' cried Frodo, feeling that amazement could go no further, and quite
unable to decide whether he felt angry, amused, relieved, or merely foolish.
 'Yes, sir!' said Sam. 'Begging your pardon, sir! But I meant no wrong to
you, Mr. Frodo, nor to Mr. Gandalf for that matter. _He_ has some sense, mind
you; and when you said _go alone,_ he said _no! lake someone as you can
trust.'_
 'But it does not seem that I can trust anyone,' said Frodo. Sam looked at
him unhappily. 'It all depends on what you want,' put in Merry. 'You can trust
us to stick to you through thick and thin – to the bitter end. And you can
trust us to keep any secret of yours – closer than you keep it yourself. But
you cannot trust us to let you face trouble alone, and go off without a word.
We are your friends, Frodo. Anyway: there it is. We know most of what Gandalf
has told you. We know a good deal about the Ring. We are horribly afraid – but
we are coming with you; or following you like hounds.'
 'And after all, sir,' added Sam, 'you did ought to take the Elves'
advice. Gildor said you should take them as was willing, and you can't deny
it.'
 'I don't deny it,' said Frodo, looking at Sam, who was now grinning. 'I
don't deny it, but I'll never believe you are sleeping again, whether you
snore or not. I shall kick you hard to make sure.
 'You are a set of deceitful scoundrels!' he said, turning to the others.
'But bless you!' he laughed, getting up and waving his arms, 'I give in. I
will take Gildor's advice. If the danger were not so dark, I should dance for
joy. Even so, I cannot help feeling happy; happier than I have felt for a long
time. I had dreaded this evening.'
 'Good! That's settled. Three cheers for Captain Frodo and company!' they
shouted; and they danced round him. Merry and Pippin began a song, which they
had apparently got ready for the occasion.
 It was made on the model of the dwarf-song that started Bilbo on his
adventure long ago, and went to the same tune:
 Farewell we call to hearth and hall!
 Though wind may blow and rain may fall,
 We must away ere break of day
 Far over wood and mountain tall.
 To Rivendell, where Elves yet dwell
 In glades beneath the misty fell,
 Through moor and waste we ride in haste,
 And whither then we cannot tell.
 With foes ahead, behind us dread,
 Beneath the sky shall be our bed,
 Until at last our toil be passed,
 Our journey done, our errand sped.
 We must away! We must away!
 We ride before the break of day!
 'Very good!' said Frodo. 'But in that case there are a lot of things to
do before we go to bed – under a roof, for tonight at any rate.'
 'Oh! That was poetry!' said Pippin. 'Do you really mean to start before
the break of day?'
 'I don't know,' answered Frodo. 'I fear those Black Riders, and I am sure
it is unsafe to stay in one place long, especially in a place to which it is
known I was going. Also Gildor advised me not to wait. But I should very much
like to see Gandalf. I could see that even Gildor was disturbed when he heard
that Gandalf had never appeared. It really depends on two things. How soon
could the Riders get to Bucklebury? And how soon could we get off? It will
take a good deal of preparation.'
 'The answer to the second question,' said Merry, 'is that we could get
off in an hour. I have prepared practically everything. There are six ponies
in a stable across the fields; stores and tackle are all packed, except for a
few extra clothes, and the perishable food.'
 'It seems to have been a very efficient conspiracy,' said Frodo. 'But
what about the Black Riders? Would it be safe to wait one day for Gandalf?'
 'That all depends on what you think the Riders would do, if they found
you here,' answered Merry. 'They _could_ have reached here by now, of course,
if they were not stopped at the North-gate, where the Hedge runs down to the
river-bank, just this side of the Bridge. The gate-guards would not let them
through by night, though they might break through. Even in the daylight they
would try to keep them out, I think, at any rate until they got a message
through to the Master of the Hall – for they would not like the look of the
Riders, and would certainly be frightened by them. But, of course, Buckland
cannot resist a determined attack for long. And it is possible that in the
morning even a Black Rider that rode up and asked for Mr. Baggins would be let
through. It is pretty generally known that you are coming back to live at
Crickhollow.'
 Frodo sat for a while in thought. 'I have made up my mind,' he said
finally. 'I am starting tomorrow, as soon as it is light. But I am not going
by road: it would be safer to wait here than that. If I go through the Northgate my departure from
Buckland will be known at once, instead of being secret
for several days at least, as it might be. And what is more, the Bridge and
the East Road near the borders will certainly be watched, whether any Rider
gets into Buckland or not. We don't know how many there are; but there are at
least two, and possibly more. The only thing to do is to go off in a quite
unexpected direction.'
 'But that can only mean going into the Old Forest!' said Fredegar
horrified. 'You can't be thinking of doing that. It is quite as dangerous as
Black Riders.'
 'Not quite,' said Merry. It sounds very desperate, but I believe Frodo is
right. It is the only way of getting off without being followed at once. With
luck we might gel a considerable start.'
 'But you won't have any luck in the Old Forest,' objected Fredegar. 'No
one ever has luck in there. You'll gel lost. People don't go in there.'
 'Oh yes they do!' said Merry. 'The Brandybucks go in – occasionally when
the fit takes them. We have a private entrance. Frodo went in once, long ago.
I have been in several times: usually in daylight, of course, when the trees
are sleepy and fairly quiet.'
 'Well, do as you think best!' said Fredegar. 'I am more afraid of the Old
Forest than of anything I know about: the stories about it are a nightmare;
but my vote hardly counts, as I am not going on the journey. Still, I am very
glad someone is stopping behind, who can tell Gandalf what you have done, when
he turns up, as I am sure he will before long.'
 Fond as he was of Frodo, Fatty Bolger had no desire to leave the Shire,
nor to see what lay outside it. His family came from the Eastfarthing, from
Budgeford in Bridgefields in fact, but he had never been over the Brandywine
Bridge. His task, according to the original plans of the conspirators, was to
stay behind and deal with inquisitive folk, and to keep up as long as possible
the pretence that Mr. Baggins was still living at Crickhollow. He had even
brought along some old clothes of Frodo's to help him in playing the part.
They little thought how dangerous that part might prove.
 'Excellent!' said Frodo, when he understood the plan. 'We could not have
left any message behind for Gandalf otherwise. I don't know whether these
Riders can read or not, of course, but I should not have dared to risk a
written message, in case they got in and searched the house. But if Fatty is
willing to hold the fort, and I can be sure of Gandalf knowing the way we have
gone, that decides me. I am going into the Old Forest first thing tomorrow.'
 'Well, that's that,' said Pippin. 'On the whole I would rather have our
job than Fatty's – waiting here till Black Riders come.'
 'You wait till you are well inside the Forest,' said Fredegar. 'You'll
wish you were back here with me before this time tomorrow.'
 'It's no good arguing about it any more,' said Merry. 'We have still got
to tidy up and put the finishing touches to the packing, before we get to bed.
I shall call you all before the break of day.'
 When at last he had got to bed, Frodo could not sleep for some time. His
legs ached. He. was glad that he was riding in the morning. Eventually he fell
into a vague dream, in which he seemed to be looking out of a high window over
a dark sea of tangled trees. Down below among the roots there was the sound of
creatures crawling and snuffling. He felt sure they would smell him out sooner
or later.
 Then he heard a noise in the distance. At first he thought it was a great
wind coming over the leaves of the forest. Then he knew that it was not
leaves, but the sound of the Sea far-off; a sound he had never heard in waking
life, though it had often troubled his dreams. Suddenly he found he was out in
the open. There were no trees after all. He was on a dark heath, and there was
a strange salt smell in the air. Looking up he saw before him a tall white
tower, standing alone on a high ridge. A great desire came over him to climb
the tower and see the Sea. He started to struggle up the ridge towards the
tower: but suddenly a light came in the sky, and there was a noise of thunder.
 _Chapter 6_
 The Old Forest
 Frodo woke suddenly. It was still dark in the room. Merry was standing
there with a candle in one hand, and banging on the door with the other. 'All
right! What is it?' said Frodo, still shaken and bewildered.
 'What is it!' cried Merry. 'It is time to get up. It is half past four
and very foggy. Come on! Sam is already getting breakfast ready. Even Pippin
is up. I am just going to saddle the ponies, and fetch the one that is to be
the baggage-carrier. Wake that sluggard Fatty! At least he must get up and see
us off.'
 Soon after six o'clock the five hobbits were ready to start. Fatty Bolger
was still yawning. They stole quietly out of the house. Merry went in front
leading a laden pony, and took his way along a path that went through a
spinney behind the house, and then cut across several fields. The leaves of
trees were glistening, and every twig was dripping; the grass was grey with
cold dew. Everything was still, and far-away noises seemed near and clear:
fowls chattering in a yard, someone closing a door of a distant house.
 In their shed they found the ponies; sturdy little beasts of the kind
loved by hobbits, not speedy, but good for a long day's work. They mounted,
and soon they were riding off into the mist, which seemed to open reluctantly
before them and close forbiddingly behind them. After riding for about an
hour, slowly and without talking, they saw the Hedge looming suddenly ahead.
It was tall and netted over with silver cobwebs. 'How are you going to get
through this?' asked Fredegar. 'Follow me!' said Merry, 'and you will see.' He
turned to the left along the Hedge, and soon they came to a point where it
bent inwards, running along the lip of a hollow. A cutting had been made, at
some distance from the Hedge, and went sloping gently down into the ground. It
had walls of brick at the sides, which rose steadily, until suddenly they
arched over and formed a tunnel that dived deep under the Hedge and came out
in the hollow on the other side.
 Here Fatty Bolger halted. 'Good-bye, Frodo!' he said. 'I wish you were
not going into the Forest. I only hope you will not need rescuing before the
day is out. But good luck to you – today and every day!'
 'If there are no worse things ahead than the Old Forest, I shall be
lucky,' said Frodo. 'Tell Gandalf to hurry along the East Road: we shall soon
be back on it and going as fast as we can.' 'Good-bye!' they cried, and rode
down the slope and disappeared from Fredegar's sight into the tunnel.
 It was dark and damp. At the far end it was closed by a gate of thick-set
iron bars. Merry got down and unlocked the gate, and when they had all passed
through he pushed it to again. It shut with a clang, and the lock clicked. The
sound was ominous.
 'There!' said Merry. 'You have left the Shire, and are now outside, and
on the edge of the Old Forest.'
 'Are the stories about it true?' asked Pippin.
 'I don't know what stories you mean,' Merry answered. 'If you mean the
old bogey-stories Fatty's nurses used to tell him, about goblins and wolves
and things of that sort, I should say no. At any rate I don't believe them.
But the Forest _is_ queer. Everything in it is very much more alive, more
aware of what is going on, so to speak, than things are in the Shire. And the
trees do not like strangers. They watch you. They are usually content merely
to watch you, as long as daylight lasts, and don't do much. Occasionally the
most unfriendly ones may drop a branch, or stick a root out, or grasp at you
with a long trailer. But at night things can be most alarming, or so I am
told. I have only once or twice been in here after dark, and then only near
the hedge. I thought all the trees were whispering to each other, passing news
and plots along in an unintelligible language; and the branches swayed and
groped without any wind. They do say the trees do actually move, and can
surround strangers and hem them in. In fact long ago they attacked the Hedge:
they came and planted themselves right by it, and leaned over it. But the
hobbits came and cut down hundreds of trees, and made a great bonfire in the
Forest, and burned all the ground in a long strip east of the Hedge. After
that the trees gave up the attack, but they became very unfriendly. There is
still a wide bare space not far inside where the bonfire was made.'
 'Is it only the trees that are dangerous?' asked Pippin.
 'There are various queer things living deep in the Forest, and on the far
side,' said Merry, 'or at least I have heard so; but I have never seen any of
them. But something makes paths. Whenever one comes inside one finds open
tracks; but they seem to shift and change from time to time in a queer
fashion. Not far from this tunnel there is, or was for a long time, the
beginning of quite a broad path leading to the Bonfire Glade, and then on more
or less in our direction, east and a little north. That is the path I am going
to try and find.'
 The hobbits now left the tunnel-gate and rode across the wide hollow. On
the far side was a faint path leading up on to the floor of the Forest, a
hundred yards and more beyond the Hedge; but it vanished as soon as it brought
them under the trees. Looking back they could see the dark line of the Hedge
through the stems of trees that were already thick about them. Looking ahead
they could see only tree-trunks of innumerable sizes and shapes: straight or
bent, twisted, leaning, squat or slender, smooth or gnarled and branched; and
all the stems were green or grey with moss and slimy, shaggy growths.
 Merry alone seemed fairly cheerful. 'You had better lead on and find that
path,' Frodo said to him. 'Don't let us lose one another, or forget which way
the Hedge lies!'
 They picked a way among the trees, and their ponies plodded along,
carefully avoiding the many writhing and interlacing roots. There was no
undergrowth. The ground was rising steadily, and as they went forward it
seemed that the trees became taller, darker, and thicker. There was no sound,
except an occasional drip of moisture falling through the still leaves. For
the moment there was no whispering or movement among the branches; but they
all got an uncomfortable feeling that they were being watched with
disapproval, deepening to dislike and even enmity. The feeling steadily grew,
until they found themselves looking up quickly, or glancing back over their
shoulders, as if they expected a sudden blow.
 There was not as yet any sign of a path, and the trees seemed constantly
to bar their way. Pippin suddenly felt that he could not bear it any longer,
and without warning let out a shout. 'Oi! Oi!' he cried. 'I am not going to do
anything. Just let me pass through, will you!'
 The others halted startled; but the cry fell as if muffled by a heavy
curtain. There was no echo or answer though the wood seemed to become more
crowded and more watchful than before.
 'I should not shout, if I were you,' said Merry. It does more harm than
good.'
 Frodo began to wonder if it were possible to find a way through, and if
he had been right to make the others come into this abominable wood. Merry was
looking from side to side, and seemed already uncertain which way to go.
Pippin noticed it. 'It has not taken you long to lose us,' he said. But at
that moment Merry gave a whistle of relief and pointed ahead.
 'Well, well!' he said. 'These trees _do_ shift. There is the Bonfire
Glade in front of us (or I hope so), but the path to it seems to have moved
away!'
 The light grew clearer as they went forward. Suddenly they came out of
the trees and found themselves in a wide circular space. There was sky above
them, blue and clear to their surprise, for down under the Forest-roof they
had not been able to see the rising morning and the lifting of the mist. The
sun was not, however, high enough yet to shine down into the clearing, though
its light was on the tree-tops. The leaves were all thicker and greener about
the edges of the glade, enclosing it with an almost solid wall. No tree grew
there, only rough grass and many tall plants: stalky and faded hemlocks and
wood-parsley, fire-weed seeding into fluffy ashes, and rampant nettles and
thistles. A dreary place: but it seemed a charming and cheerful garden after
the close Forest.
 The hobbits felt encouraged, and looked up hopefully at the broadening
daylight in the sky. At the far side of the glade there was a break in the
wall of trees, and a clear path beyond it. They could see it running on into
the wood, wide in places and open above, though every now and again the trees
drew in and overshadowed it with their dark boughs. Up this path they rode.
They were still climbing gently, but they now went much quicker, and with
better heart; for it seemed to them that the Forest had relented, and was
going to let them pass unhindered after all.
 But after a while the air began to get hot and stuffy. The trees drew
close again on either side, and they could no longer see far ahead. Now
stronger than ever they felt again the ill will of the wood pressing on them.
So silent was it that the fall of their ponies' hoofs, rustling on dead leaves
and occasionally stumbling on hidden roots, seemed to thud in their ears.
Frodo tried to sing a song to encourage them, but his voice sank to a murmur.
 O! Wanderers in the shadowed land
 despair not! For though dark they stand,
 all woods there be must end at last,
 and see the open sun go past:
 the setting sun, the rising sun,
 the day's end, or the day begun.
 For east or west all woods must fail ...
 _Fail -_ even as he said the word his voice faded into silence. The air
seemed heavy and the making of words wearisome. Just behind them a large
branch fell from an old overhanging tree with a crash into the path. The trees
seemed to close in before them.
 'They do not like all that about ending and failing,' said Merry. 'I
should not sing any more at present. Wait till we do get to the edge, and then
we'll turn and give them a rousing chorus!'
 He spoke cheerfully, and if he felt any great anxiety, he did not show
it. The others did not answer. They were depressed. A heavy weight was
settling steadily on Frodo's heart, and he regretted now with every step
forward that he had ever thought of challenging the menace of the trees. He
was, indeed, just about to stop and propose going back (if that was still
possible), when things took a new turn. The path stopped climbing, and became
for a while nearly level. The dark trees drew aside, and ahead they could see
the path going almost straight forward. Before them, but some distance off,
there stood a green hill-top, treeless, rising like a bald head out of the
encircling wood. The path seemed to be making directly for it.
 They now hurried forward again, delighted with the thought of climbing
out for a while above the roof of the Forest. The path dipped, and then again
began to climb upwards, leading them at last to the foot of the steep
hillside. There it left the trees and faded into the turf. The wood stood all
round the hill like thick hair that ended sharply in a circle round a shaven
crown.
 The hobbits led their ponies up, winding round and round until they
reached the top. There they stood and gazed about them. The air was gleaming
and sunlit, but hazy; and they could not see to any great distance. Near at
hand the mist was now almost gone; though here and there it lay in hollows of
the wood, and to the south of them, out of a deep fold cutting right across
the Forest, the fog still rose like steam or wisps of white smoke.
 'That,' said Merry, pointing with his hand, 'that is the line of the
Withywindle. It comes down out of the Downs and flows south-west through the
midst of the Forest to join the Brandywine below Haysend. We don't want to go
_that_ way! The Withywindle valley is said to be the queerest part of the
whole wood – the centre from which all the queerness comes, as it were.'
 The others looked in the direction that Merry pointed out, but they could
see little but mists over the damp and deep-cut valley; and beyond it the
southern half of the Forest faded from view.
 The sun on the hill-lop was now getting hot. It must have been about
eleven o'clock; but the autumn haze still prevented them from seeing much in
other directions. In the west they could not make out either the line of the
Hedge or the valley of the Brandywine beyond it. Northward, where they looked
most hopefully, they could see nothing that might be the line of the great
East Road, for which they were making. They were on an island in a sea of
trees, and the horizon was veiled.
 On the south-eastern side the ground fell very steeply, as if the slopes
of the hill were continued far down under the trees, like island-shores that
really are the sides of a mountain rising out of deep waters. They sat on the
green edge and looked out over the woods below them, while they ate their midday meal. As the sun
rose and passed noon they glimpsed far off in the east
the grey-green lines of the Downs that lay beyond the Old Forest on that side.
That cheered them greatly; for it was good to see a sight of anything beyond
the wood's borders, though they did not mean to go that way, if they could
help it: the Barrow-downs had as sinister a reputation in hobbit-legend as the
Forest itself.
 At length they made up their minds to go on again. The path that had
brought them to the hill reappeared on the northward side; but they had not
followed it far before they became aware that it was bending steadily to the
right. Soon it began to descend rapidly and they guessed that it must actually
be heading towards the Withywindle valley: not at all the direction they
wished lo take. After some discussion they decided to leave this misleading
path and strike northward; for although they had not been able to see it from
the hill-top, the Road must lie that way, and it could not be many miles off.
Also northward, and to the left of the path, the land seemed lo be drier and
more open, climbing up to slopes where the trees were thinner, and pines and
firs replaced the oaks and ashes and other strange and nameless trees of the
denser wood.
 At first their choice seemed to be good: they got along at a fair speed,
though whenever they got a glimpse of the sun in an open glade they seemed
unaccountably to have veered eastwards. But after a time the trees began to
close in again, just where they had appeared from a distance to be thinner and
less tangled. Then deep folds in the ground were discovered unexpectedly, like
the ruts of great giant-wheels or wide moats and sunken roads long disused and
choked with brambles. These lay usually right across their line of march, and
could only be crossed by scrambling down and out again, which was troublesome
and difficult with their ponies. Each time they climbed down they found the
hollow filled with thick bushes and matted undergrowth, which somehow would
not yield to the left, but only gave way when they turned to the right; and
they had to go some distance along the bottom before they could find a way up
the further bank. Each time they clambered out, the trees seemed deeper and
darker; and always to the left and upwards it was most difficult to find a
way, and they were forced to the right and downwards.
 After an hour or two they had lost all clear sense of direction, though
they knew well enough that they had long ceased to go northward at all. They
were being headed off, and were simply following a course chosen for them –
eastwards and southwards, into the heart of the Forest and not out of it.
 The afternoon was wearing away when they scrambled and stumbled into a
fold that was wider and deeper than any they had yet met. It was so sleep and
overhung that it proved impossible to climb out of it again, either forwards
or backwards, without leaving their ponies and their baggage behind. All they
could do was to follow the fold – downwards. The ground grew soft, and in
places boggy; springs appeared in the banks, and soon they found themselves
following a brook that trickled and babbled through a weedy bed. Then the
ground began to fall rapidly, and the brook growing strong and noisy, flowed
and leaped swiftly downhill. They were in a deep dim-lit gully over-arched by
trees high above them.
 After stumbling along for some way along the stream, they came quite
suddenly out of the gloom. As if through a gate they saw the sunlight before
them. Coming to the opening they found that they had made their way down
through a cleft in a high sleep bank, almost a cliff. At its feet was a wide
space of grass and reeds; and in the distance could be glimpsed another bank
almost as steep. A golden afternoon of late sunshine lay warm and drowsy upon
the hidden land between. In the midst of it there wound lazily a dark river of
brown water, bordered with ancient willows, arched over with willows, blocked
with fallen willows, and flecked with thousands of faded willow-leaves. The
air was thick with them, fluttering yellow from the branches; for there was a
warm and gentle breeze blowing softly in the valley, and the reeds were
rustling, and the willow-boughs were creaking.
 'Well, now I have at least some notion of where we are!' said Merry. 'We
have come almost in the opposite direction to which we intended. This is the
River Withywindle! I will go on and explore.'
 He passed out into the sunshine and disappeared into the long grasses.
After a while he reappeared, and reported that there was fairly solid ground
between the cliff-foot and the river; in some places firm turf went down to
the water's edge. 'What's more,' he said, 'there seems to be something like a
footpath winding along on this side of the river. If we turn left and follow
it, we shall be bound to come out on the east side of the Forest eventually.'
 'I dare say!' said Pippin. 'That is, if the track goes on so far, and
does not simply lead us into a bog and leave us there. Who made the track, do
you suppose, and why? I am sure it was not for our benefit. I am getting very
suspicious of this Forest and everything in it, and I begin to believe all the
stories about it. And have you any idea how far eastward we should have to
go?'
 'No,' said Merry, 'I haven't. I don't know in the least how far down the
Withywindle we are, or who could possibly come here often enough to make a
path along it. But there is no other way out that I can see or think of.'
 There being nothing else for it, they filed out, and Merry led them to
the path that he had discovered. Everywhere the reeds and grasses were lush
and tall, in places far above their heads; but once found, the path was easy
to follow, as it turned and twisted, picking out the sounder ground among the
bogs and pools. Here and there it passed over other rills, running down
gullies into the Withywindle out of the higher forest-lands, and at these
points there were tree-trunks or bundles of brushwood laid carefully across.
 The hobbits began to feel very hot. There were armies of flies of all
kinds buzzing round their ears, and the afternoon sun was burning on their
backs. At last they came suddenly into a thin shade; great grey branches
reached across the path. Each step forward became more reluctant than the
last. Sleepiness seemed to be creeping out of the ground and up their legs,
and falling softly out of the air upon their heads and eyes.
 Frodo felt his chin go down and his head nod. Just in front of him Pippin
fell forward on to his knees. Frodo halted. 'It's no good,' he heard Merry
saying. 'Can't go another step without rest. Must have nap. It's cool under
the willows. Less flies!'
 Frodo did not like the sound of this. 'Come on!' he cried. 'We can't have
a nap yet. We must get clear of the Forest first.' But the others were too far
gone to care. Beside them Sam stood yawning and blinking stupidly.
 Suddenly Frodo himself felt sleep overwhelming him. His head swam. There
now seemed hardly a sound in the air. The flies had stopped buzzing. Only a
gentle noise on the edge of hearing, a soft fluttering as of a song half
whispered, seemed to stir in the boughs above. He lifted his heavy eyes and
saw leaning over him a huge willow-tree, old and hoary. Enormous it looked,
its sprawling branches going up like reaching arms with many long-fingered
hands, its knotted and twisted trunk gaping in wide fissures that creaked
faintly as the boughs moved. The leaves fluttering against the bright sky
dazzled him, and he toppled over, lying where he fell upon the grass.
 Merry and Pippin dragged themselves forward and lay down with their backs
to the willow-trunk. Behind them the great cracks gaped wide to receive them
as the tree swayed and creaked. They looked up at the grey and yellow leaves,
moving softly against the light, and singing. They shut their eyes, and then
it seemed that they could almost hear words, cool words, saying something
about water and sleep. They gave themselves up to the spell and fell fast
asleep at the foot of the great grey willow.
 Frodo lay for a while fighting with the sleep that was overpowering him;
then with an effort he struggled to his feel again. He felt a compelling
desire for cool water. 'Wait for me, Sam,' he stammered. 'Must bathe feet a
minute.'
 Half in a dream he wandered forward to the riverward side of the tree,
where great winding roots grew out into the stream, like gnarled dragonets
straining down to drink. He straddled one of these, and paddled his hot feel
in the cool brown water; and there he too suddenly fell asleep with his back
against the tree.
 Sam sat down and scratched his head, and yawned like a cavern. He was
worried. The afternoon was getting late, and he thought this sudden sleepiness
uncanny. 'There's more behind this than sun and warm air,' he muttered to
himself. 'I don't like this great big tree. I don't trust it. Hark at it
singing about sleep now! This won't do at all!'
 He pulled himself to his feet, and staggered off to see what had become
of the ponies. He found that two had wandered on a good way along the path;
and he had just caught them and brought them back towards the others, when he
heard two noises; one loud, and the other soft but very clear. One was the
splash of something heavy falling into the water; the other was a noise like
the snick of a lock when a door quietly closes fast.
 He rushed back to the bank. Frodo was in the water close to the edge, and
a great tree-root seemed to be over him and holding him down, but he was not
struggling. Sam gripped him by the jacket, and dragged him from under the
root; and then with difficulty hauled him on to the bank. Almost at once he
woke, and coughed and spluttered.
 'Do you know, Sam,' he said at length, 'the beastly tree _threw_ me in! I
felt it. The big root just twisted round and tipped me in!'
 'You were dreaming I expect, Mr. Frodo,' said Sam. 'You shouldn't sit in
such a place, if you feel sleepy.'
 'What about the others?' Frodo asked. 'I wonder what sort of dreams they
are having.'
 They went round to the other side of the tree, and then Sam understood
the click that he had heard. Pippin had vanished. The crack by which he had
laid himself had closed together, so that not a chink could be seen. Merry was
trapped: another crack had closed about his waist; his legs lay outside, but
the rest of him was inside a dark opening, the edges of which gripped like a
pair of pincers.
 Frodo and Sam beat first upon the tree-trunk where Pippin had lain. They
then struggled frantically to pull open the jaws of the crack that held poor
Merry. It was quite useless.
 'What a foul thing to happen!' cried Frodo wildly. 'Why did we ever come
into this dreadful Forest? I wish we were all back at Crickhollow!' He kicked
the tree with all his strength, heedless of his own feet. A hardly perceptible
shiver ran through the stem and up into the branches; the leaves rustled and
whispered, but with a sound now of faint and far-off laughter.
 'I suppose we haven't got an axe among our luggage, Mr. Frodo?' asked
Sam.
 'I brought a little hatchet for chopping firewood,' said Frodo. 'That
wouldn't be much use.'
 'Wait a minute!' cried Sam, struck by an idea suggested by firewood. 'We
might do something with fire!'
 'We might,' said Frodo doubtfully. 'We might succeed in roasting Pippin
alive inside.'
 'We might try to hurt or frighten this tree to begin with,' said Sam
fiercely. 'If it don't let them go, I'll have it down, if I have to gnaw it.'
He ran to the ponies and before long came back with two tinder-boxes and a
hatchet.
 Quickly they gathered dry grass and leaves, and bits of bark; and made a
pile of broken twigs and chopped sticks. These they heaped against the trunk
on the far side of the tree from the prisoners. As soon as Sam had struck a
spark into the tinder, it kindled the dry grass and a flurry of flame and
smoke went up. The twigs crackled. Little fingers of fire licked against the
dry scored rind of the ancient tree and scorched it. A tremor ran through the
whole willow. The leaves seemed to hiss above their heads with a sound of pain
and anger. A loud scream came from Merry, and from far inside the tree they
heard Pippin give a muffled yell.
 'Put it out! Put it out!' cried Merry. 'He'll squeeze me in two, if you
don't. He says so!'
 'Who? What?' shouted Frodo, rushing round to the other side of the tree.
 'Put it out! Put it out!' begged Merry. The branches of the willow began
to sway violently. There was a sound as of a wind rising and spreading
outwards to the branches of all the other trees round about, as though they
had dropped a stone into the quiet slumber of the river-valley and set up
ripples of anger that ran out over the whole Forest. Sam kicked at the little
fire and stamped out the sparks. But Frodo, without any clear idea of why he
did so, or what he hoped for, ran along the path crying _help! help! help!_It
seemed to him that he could hardly hear the sound of his own shrill voice: it
was blown away from him by the willow-wind and drowned in a clamour of leaves,
as soon as the words left his mouth. He felt desperate: lost and witless.
 Suddenly he slopped. There was an answer, or so he thought; but it seemed
to come from behind him, away down the path further back in the Forest. He
turned round and listened, and soon there could be no doubt: someone was
singing a song; a deep glad voice was singing carelessly and happily, but it
was singing nonsense:
 Hey dol! merry dol! ring a dong dillo!
 Ring a dong! hop along! fal lal the willow!
 Tom Bom, jolly Tom, Tom Bombadillo!
 Half hopeful and half afraid of some new danger, Frodo and Sam now both
stood still. Suddenly out of a long string of nonsense-words (or so they
seemed) the voice rose up loud and clear and burst into this song:
 Hey! Come merry dot! derry dol! My darling!
 Light goes the weather-wind and the feathered starling.
 Down along under Hill, shining in the sunlight,
 Waiting on the doorstep for the cold starlight,
 There my pretty lady is. River-woman's daughter,
 Slender as the willow-wand, clearer than the water.
 Old Tom Bombadil water-lilies bringing
 Comes hopping home again. Can you hear him singing?
 Hey! Come merry dol! deny dol! and merry-o,
 Goldberry, Goldberry, merry yellow berry-o!
 Poor old Willow-man, you tuck your roots away!
 Tom's in a hurry now. Evening will follow day.
 Tom's going home again water-lilies bringing.
 Hey! Come derry dol! Can you hear me singing?
 Frodo and Sam stood as if enchanted. The wind puffed out. The leaves hung
silently again on stiff branches. There was another burst of song, and then
suddenly, hopping and dancing along the path, there appeared above the reeds
an old battered hat with a tall crown and a long blue feather stuck in the
band. With another hop and a bound there came into view a man, or so it
seemed. At any rate he was too large and heavy for a hobbit, if not quite tall
enough for one of the Big People, though he made noise enough for one,
slumping along with great yellow boots on his thick legs, and charging through
grass and rushes like a cow going down to drink. He had a blue coat and a long
brown beard; his eyes were blue and bright, and his face was red as a ripe
apple, but creased into a hundred wrinkles of laughter. In his hands he
carried on a large leaf as on a tray a small pile of white water-lilies.
 'Help!' cried Frodo and Sam running towards him with their hands
stretched out.
 'Whoa! Whoa! steady there!' cried the old man, holding up one hand, and
they stopped short, as if they had been struck stiff. 'Now, my little fellows,
where be you a-going to, puffing like a bellows? What's the matter here then?
Do you know who I am? I'm Tom Bombadil. Tell me what's your trouble! Tom's in
a hurry now. Don't you crush my lilies!'
 'My friends are caught in the willow-tree,' cried Frodo breathlessly.
 'Master Merry's being squeezed in a crack!' cried Sam.
 'What?' shouted Tom Bombadil, leaping up in the air. 'Old Man Willow?
Naught worse than that, eh? That can soon be mended. I know the tune for him.
Old grey Willow-man! I'll freeze his marrow cold, if he don't behave himself.
I'll sing his roots off. I'll sing a wind up and blow leaf and branch away.
Old Man Willow!' Setting down his lilies carefully on the grass, he ran to the
tree. There he saw Merry's feet still sticking out – the rest had already been
drawn further inside. Tom put his mouth to the crack and began singing into it
in a low voice. They could not catch the words, but evidently Merry was
aroused. His legs began to kick. Tom sprang away, and breaking off a hanging
branch smote the side of the willow with it. 'You let them out again, Old Man
Willow!' he said. 'What be you a-thinking of? You should not be waking. Eat
earth! Dig deep! Drink water! Go to sleep! Bombadil is talking!' He then
seized Merry's feet and drew him out of the suddenly widening crack.
 There was a tearing creak and the other crack split open, and out of it
Pippin sprang, as if he had been kicked. Then with a loud snap both cracks
closed fast again. A shudder ran through the tree from root to tip, and
complete silence fell.
 'Thank you!' said the hobbits, one after the other.
 Tom Bombadil burst out laughing. 'Well, my little fellows!' said he,
stooping so that he peered into their faces. 'You shall come home with me! The
table is all laden with yellow cream, honeycomb, and white bread and butter.
Goldberry is waiting. Time enough for questions around the supper table. You
follow after me as quick as you are able!' With that he picked up his lilies,
and then with a beckoning wave of his hand went hopping and dancing along the
path eastward, still singing loudly and nonsensically.
 Too surprised and too relieved to talk, the hobbits followed after him as
fast as they could. But that was not fast enough. Tom soon disappeared in
front of them, and the noise of his singing got fainter and further away.
Suddenly his voice came floating back to them in a loud halloo!
 Hop along, my little friends, up the Withywindle!
 Tom's going on ahead candles for to kindle.
 Down west sinks the Sun: soon you will be groping.
 When the night-shadows fall, then the door will open,
 Out of the window-panes light will twinkle yellow.
 Fear no alder black! Heed no hoary willow!
 Fear neither root nor bough! Tom goes on before you.
 Hey now! merry dot! We'll be waiting for you!
 After that the hobbits heard no more. Almost at once the sun seemed to
sink into the trees behind them. They thought of the slanting light of evening
glittering on the Brandywine River, and the windows of Bucklebury beginning to
gleam with hundreds of lights. Great shadows fell across them; trunks and
branches of trees hung dark and threatening over the path. White mists began
to rise and curl on the surface of the river and stray about the roots of the
trees upon its borders. Out of the very ground at their feet a shadowy steam
arose and mingled with the swiftly falling dusk.
 It became difficult to follow the path, and they were very tired. Their
legs seemed leaden. Strange furtive noises ran among the bushes and reeds on
either side of them; and if they looked up to the pale sky, they caught sight
of queer gnarled and knobbly faces that gloomed dark against the twilight, and
leered down at them from the high bank and the edges of the wood. They began
to feel that all this country was unreal, and that they were stumbling through
an ominous dream that led to no awakening.
 Just as they felt their feet slowing down to a standstill, they noticed
that the ground was gently rising. The water began to murmur. In the darkness
they caught the white glimmer of foam, where the river flowed over a short
fall. Then suddenly the trees came to an end and the mists were left behind.
They stepped out from the Forest, and found a wide sweep of grass welling up
before them. The river, now small and swift, was leaping merrily down to meet
them, glinting here and there in the light of the stars, which were already
shining in the sky.
 The grass under their feet was smooth and short, as if it had been mown
or shaven. The eaves of the Forest behind were clipped, and trim as a hedge.
The path was now plain before them, well-tended and bordered with stone. It
wound up on to the top of a grassy knoll, now grey under the pale starry
night; and there, still high above them on a further slope, they saw the
twinkling lights of a house. Down again the path went, and then up again, up a
long smooth hillside of turf, towards the light. Suddenly a wide yellow beam
flowed out brightly from a door that was opened. There was Tom Bombadil's
house before them, up, down, under hill. Behind it a steep shoulder of the
land lay grey and bare, and beyond that the dark shapes of the Barrow-downs
stalked away into the eastern night.
 They all hurried forward, hobbits and ponies. Already half their
weariness and all their fears had fallen from them. _Hey! Come merry dol!_
rolled out the song to greet them.
 Hey! Come derry dol! Hop along, my hearties!
 Hobbits! Ponies all! We are fond of parties.
 Now let the fun begin! Let us sing together!
 Then another clear voice, as young and as ancient as Spring, like the
song of a glad water flowing down into the night from a bright morning in the
hills, came falling like silver to meet them:
 Now let the song begin! Let us sing together
 Of sun, stars, moon and mist, rain and cloudy weather,
 Light on the budding leaf, dew on the feather,
 Wind on the open hill, bells on the heather,
 Reeds by the shady pool, lilies on the water:
 Old Tom Bombadil and the River-daughter!
 And with that song the hobbits stood upon the threshold, and a golden
light was all about them.
 _Chapter 7_
 In the House of Tom Bombadil
 The four hobbits stepped over the wide stone threshold, and stood still,
blinking. They were in a long low room, filled with the light of lamps
swinging from the beams of the roof; and on the table of dark polished wood
stood many candles, tall and yellow, burning brightly.
 In a chair, at the far side of the room facing the outer door, sat a
woman. Her long yellow hair rippled down her shoulders; her gown was green,
green as young reeds, shot with silver like beads of dew; and her belt was of
gold, shaped like a chain of flag-lilies set with the pale-blue eyes of
forget-me-nots. About her feel in wide vessels of green and brown earthenware,
white water-lilies were floating, so that she seemed to be enthroned in the
midst of a pool.
 'Enter, good guests!' she said, and as she spoke they knew that it was
her clear voice they had heard singing. They came a few timid steps further
into the room, and began to bow low, feeling strangely surprised and awkward,
like folk that, knocking at a cottage door to beg for a drink of water, have
been answered by a fair young elf-queen clad in living flowers. But before
they could say anything, she sprang lightly up and over the lily-bowls, and
ran laughing towards them; and as she ran her gown rustled softly like the
wind in the flowering borders of a river.
 'Come dear folk!' she said, taking Frodo by the hand. 'Laugh and be
merry! I am Goldberry, daughter of the River.' Then lightly she passed them
and closing the door she turned her back to it, with her white arms spread out
across it. 'Let us shut out the night!' she said. 'For you are still afraid,
perhaps, of mist and tree-shadows and deep water, and untame things. Fear
nothing! For tonight you are under the roof of Tom Bombadil.'
 The hobbits looked at her in wonder; and she looked at each of them and
smiled. 'Fair lady Goldberry!' said Frodo at last, feeling his heart moved
with a joy that he did not understand. He stood as he had at times stood
enchanted by fair elven-voices; but the spell that was now laid upon him was
different: less keen and lofty was the delight, but deeper and nearer to
mortal heart; marvellous and yet not strange. 'Fair lady Goldberry!' he said
again. 'Now the joy that was hidden in the songs we heard is made plain to me.
 O slender as a willow-wand! O clearer than clear water!
O reed by the living pool! Fair River-daughter!
 O spring-time and summer-time, and spring again after!
 O wind on the waterfall, and the leaves' laughter!'
 Suddenly he stopped and stammered, overcome with surprise to hear himself
saying such things. But Goldberry laughed.
 'Welcome!' she said. 'I had not heard that folk of the Shire were so
sweet-tongued. But I see you are an elf-friend; the light in your eyes and the
ring in your voice tells it. This is a merry meeting! Sit now, and wait for
the Master of the house! He will not be long. He is tending your tired
beasts.'
 The hobbits sat down gladly in low rush-seated chairs, while Goldberry
busied herself about the table; and their eyes followed her, for the slender
grace of her movement filled them with quiet delight. From somewhere behind
the house came the sound of singing. Every now and again they caught, among
many a _derry dol_ and a _merry dol_ and a _ring a ding dillo_ the repeated
words:
 Old Tom Bombadil is a merry fellow;
 Bright blue his jacket is, and his boots are yellow.
 'Fair lady!' said Frodo again after a while. 'Tell me, if my asking does
not seem foolish, who is Tom Bombadil?'
 'He is,' said Goldberry, staying her swift movements and smiling.
 Frodo looked at her questioningly. 'He is, as you have seen him,' she
said in answer to his look. 'He is the Master of wood, water, and hill.'
 'Then all this strange land belongs to him?'
 'No indeed!' she answered, and her smile faded. 'That would indeed be a
burden,' she added in a low voice, as if to herself. 'The trees and the
grasses and all things growing or living in the land belong each to
themselves. Tom Bombadil is the Master. No one has ever caught old Tom walking
in the forest, wading in the water, leaping on the hill-tops under light and
shadow. He has no fear. Tom Bombadil is master.'
 A door opened and in came Tom Bombadil. He had now no hat and his thick
brown hair was crowned with autumn leaves. He laughed, and going to Goldberry,
took her hand.
 'Here's my pretty lady!' he said, bowing to the hobbits. 'Here's my
Goldberry clothed all in silver-green with flowers in her girdle! Is the table
laden? I see yellow cream and honeycomb, and white bread, and butter; milk,
cheese, and green herbs and ripe berries gathered. Is that enough for us? Is
the supper ready?'
 'It is,' said Goldberry; 'but the guests perhaps are not?'
 Tom clapped his hands and cried: 'Tom, Tom! your guests are tired, and
you had near forgotten! Come now, my merry friends, and Tom will refresh you!
You shall clean grimy hands, and wash your weary faces; cast off your muddy
cloaks and comb out your tangles!'
 He opened the door, and they followed him down a short passage and round
a sharp turn. They came to a low room with a sloping roof (a penthouse, it
seemed, built on to the north end of the house). Its walls were of clean
stone, but they were mostly covered with green hanging mats and yellow
curtains. The floor was flagged, and strewn with fresh green rushes. There
were four deep mattresses, each piled with white blankets, laid on the floor
along one side. Against the opposite wall was a long bench laden with wide
earthenware basins, and beside it stood brown ewers filled with water, some
cold, some steaming hot. There were soft green slippers set ready beside each
bed.
 Before long, washed and refreshed, the hobbits were seated at the table,
two on each side, while at either end sat Goldberry and the Master. It was a
long and merry meal. Though the hobbits ate, as only famished hobbits can eat,
there was no lack. The drink in their drinking-bowls seemed to be clear cold
water, yet it went to their hearts like wine and set free their voices. The
guests became suddenly aware that they were singing merrily, as if it was
easier and more natural than talking.
 At last Tom and Goldberry rose and cleared the table swiftly. The guests
were commanded to sit quiet, and were set in chairs, each with a footstool to
his tired feet. There was a fire in the wide hearth before them, and it was
burning with a sweet smell, as if it were built of apple-wood. When everything
was set in order, all the lights in the room were put out, except one lamp and
a pair of candles at each end of the chimney-shelf. Then Goldberry came and
stood before them, holding a candle; and she wished them each a good night and
deep sleep.
 'Have peace now,' she said, 'until the morning! Heed no nightly noises!
For nothing passes door and window here save moonlight and starlight and the
wind off the hill-top. Good night!' She passed out of the room with a glimmer
and a rustle. The sound of her footsteps was like a stream falling gently away
downhill over cool stones in the quiet of night.
 Tom sat on a while beside them in silence, while each of them tried to
muster the courage to ask one of the many questions he had meant to ask at
supper. Sleep gathered on their eyelids. At last Frodo spoke:
 'Did you hear me calling, Master, or was it just chance that brought you
at that moment?'
 Tom stirred like a man shaken out of a pleasant dream. 'Eh, what?' said
he. 'Did I hear you calling? Nay, I did not hear: I was busy singing. Just
chance brought me then, if chance you call it. It was no plan of mine, though
I was waiting for you. We heard news of you, and learned that you were
wandering. We guessed you'd come ere long down to the water: all paths lead
that way, down to Withywindle. Old grey Willow-man, he's a mighty singer; and
it's hard for little folk to escape his cunning mazes. But Tom had an errand
there, that he dared not hinder.' Tom nodded as if sleep was taking him again;
but he went on in a soft singing voice:
 I had an errand there: gathering water-lilies,
 green leaves and lilies white to please my pretty lady,
 the last ere the year's end to keep them from the winter,
 to flower by her pretty feet tilt the snows are melted.
 Each year at summer's end I go to find them for her,
 in a wide pool, deep and clear, far down Withywindle;
 there they open first in spring and there they linger latest.
 By that pool long ago I found the River-daughter,
 fair young Goldberry sitting in the rushes.
 Sweet was her singing then, and her heart was beating!
 He opened his eyes and looked at them with a sudden glint of blue:
 And that proved well for you – for now I shall no longer
 go down deep again along the forest-water,
 not while the year is old. Nor shall I be passing
 Old Man Willow's house this side of spring-time,
 not till the merry spring, when the River-daughter
 dances down the withy-path to bathe in the water.
 He fell silent again; but Frodo could not help asking one more question:
the one he most desired to have answered. 'Tell us, Master,' he said, 'about
the Willow-man. What is he? I have never heard of him before.'
 'No, don't!' said Merry and Pippin together, sitting suddenly upright.
'Not now! Not until the morning!'
 'That is right!' said the old man. 'Now is the time for resting. Some
things are ill to hear when the world's in shadow. Sleep till the morninglight, rest on the pillow! Heed no
nightly noise! Fear no grey willow!' And
with that he took down the lamp and blew it out, and grasping a candle in
either hand he led them out of the room.
 Their mattresses and pillows were soft as down, and the blankets were of
white wool. They had hardly laid themselves on the deep beds and drawn the
light covers over them before they were asleep.
 In the dead night, Frodo lay in a dream without light. Then he saw the
young moon rising; under its thin light there loomed before him a black wall
of rock, pierced by a dark arch like a great gate. It seemed to Frodo that he
was lifted up, and passing over he saw that the rock-wall was a circle of
hills, and that within it was a plain, and in the midst of the plain stood a
pinnacle of stone, like a vast tower but not made by hands. On its top stood
the figure of a man. The moon as it rose seemed to hang for a moment above his
head and glistened in his white hair as the wind stirred it. Up from the dark
plain below came the crying of fell voices, and the howling of many wolves.
Suddenly a shadow, like the shape of great wings, passed across the moon. The
figure lifted his arms and a light flashed from the staff that he wielded. A
mighty eagle swept down and bore him away. The voices wailed and the wolves
yammered. There was a noise like a strong wind blowing, and on it was borne
the sound of hoofs, galloping, galloping, galloping from the East. 'Black
Riders!' thought Frodo as he wakened, with the sound of the hoofs still
echoing in his mind. He wondered if he would ever again have the courage to
leave the safety of these stone walls. He lay motionless, still listening; but
all was now silent, and at last he turned and fell asleep again or wandered
into some other unremembered dream.
 At his side Pippin lay dreaming pleasantly; but a change came over his
dreams and he turned and groaned. Suddenly he woke, or thought he had waked,
and yet still heard in the darkness the sound that had disturbed his dream:
_tip-tap, squeak_: the noise was like branches fretting in the wind, twigfingers scraping wall and
window: _creak, creak, creak._ He wondered if there
were willow-trees close to the house; and then suddenly he had a dreadful
feeling that he was not in an ordinary house at all, but inside the willow and
listening to that horrible dry creaking voice laughing at him again. He sat
up, and felt the soft pillows yield to his hands, and he lay down again
relieved. He seemed to hear the echo of words in his ears: 'Fear nothing! Have
peace until the morning! Heed no nightly noises!' Then he went to sleep again.
 It was the sound of water that Merry heard falling into his quiet sleep:
water streaming down gently, and then spreading, spreading irresistibly all
round the house into a dark shoreless pool. It gurgled under the walls, and
was rising slowly but surely. 'I shall be drowned!' he thought. It will find
its way in, and then I shall drown.' He felt that he was lying in a soft slimy
bog, and springing up he set his fool on the corner of a cold hard flagstone.
Then he remembered where he was and lay down again. He seemed to hear or
remember hearing: 'Nothing passes doors or windows save moonlight and
starlight and the wind off the hill-top.' A little breath of sweet air moved
the curtain. He breathed deep and fell asleep again.
 As far as he could remember, Sam slept through the night in deep content,
if logs are contented.
 They woke up, all four at once, in the morning light. Tom was moving
about the room whistling like a starling. When he heard them stir he clapped
his hands, and cried: 'Hey! Come merry dol! derry dol! My hearties!' He drew
back the yellow curtains, and the hobbits saw that these had covered the
windows, at either end of the room, one looking east and the other looking
west.
 They leapt up refreshed. Frodo ran to the eastern window, and found
himself looking into a kitchen-garden grey with dew. He had half expected to
see turf right up to the walls, turf all pocked with hoof-prints. Actually his
view was screened by a tall line of beans on poles; but above and far beyond
them the grey top of the hill loomed up against the sunrise. It was a pale
morning: in the East, behind long clouds like lines of soiled wool stained red
at the edges, lay glimmering deeps of yellow. The sky spoke of rain to come;
but the light was broadening quickly, and the red flowers on the beans began
to glow against the wet green leaves.
 Pippin looked out of the western window, down into a pool of mist. The
Forest was hidden under a fog. It was like looking down on to a sloping cloudroof from above. There was
a fold or channel where the mist was broken into
many plumes and billows; the valley of the Withywindle. The stream ran down
the hill on the left and vanished into the white shadows. Near at hand was a
flower-garden and a clipped hedge silver-netted, and beyond that grey shaven
grass pale with dew-drops. There was no willow-tree to be seen.
 'Good morning, merry friends!' cried Tom, opening the eastern window
wide. A cool air flowed in; it had a rainy smell. 'Sun won't show her face
much today. I'm thinking. I have been walking wide, leaping on the hilltops,
since the grey dawn began, nosing wind and weather, wet grass underfoot, wet
sky above me. I wakened Goldberry singing under window; but nought wakes
hobbit-folk in the early morning. In the night little folk wake up in the
darkness, and sleep after light has come! Ring a ding dillo! Wake now, my
merry friends! Forget the nightly noises! Ring a ding dillo del! derry del, my
hearties! If you come soon you'll find breakfast on the table. If you come
late you'll get grass and rain-water!'
 Needless to say – not that Tom's threat sounded very serious – the
hobbits came soon, and left the table late and only when it was beginning lo
look rather empty. Neither Tom nor Goldberry were there. Tom could be heard
about the house, clattering in the kitchen, and up and down the stairs, and
singing here and there outside. The room looked westward over the mist-clouded
valley, and the window was open. Water dripped down from the thatched eaves
above. Before they had finished breakfast the clouds had joined into an
unbroken roof, and a straight grey rain came softly and steadily down. Behind
its deep curtain the Forest was completely veiled.
 As they looked out of the window there came falling gently as if it was
flowing down the rain out of the sky, the clear voice of Goldberry singing up
above them. They could hear few words, but it seemed plain to them that the
song was a rain-song, as sweet as showers on dry hills, that told the tale of
a river from the spring in the highlands to the Sea far below. The hobbits
listened with delight; and Frodo was glad in his heart, and blessed the kindly
weather, because it delayed them from departing. The thought of going had been
heavy upon him from the moment he awoke; but he guessed now that they would
not go further that day.
 The upper wind settled in the West and deeper and wetter clouds rolled up
to spill their laden rain on the bare heads of the Downs. Nothing could be
seen all round the house but falling water. Frodo stood near the open door and
watched the white chalky path turn into a little river of milk and go bubbling
away down into the valley. Tom Bombadil came trotting round the corner of the
house, waving his arms as if he was warding off the rain – and indeed when he
sprang over the threshold he seemed quite dry, except for his boots. These he
took off and put in the chimney-corner. Then he sat in the largest chair and
called the hobbits to gather round him.
 'This is Goldberry's washing day,' he said, 'and her autumn-cleaning. Too
wet for hobbit-folk – let them rest while they are able! It's a good day for
long tales, for questions and for answers, so Tom will start the talking.'
 He then told them many remarkable stories, sometimes half as if speaking
to himself, sometimes looking at them suddenly with a bright blue eye under
his deep brows. Often his voice would turn to song, and he would get out of
his chair and dance about. He told them tales of bees and flowers, the ways of
trees, and the strange creatures of the Forest, about the evil things and good
things, things friendly and things unfriendly, cruel things and kind things,
and secrets hidden under brambles.
 As they listened, they began to understand the lives of the Forest, apart
from themselves, indeed to feel themselves as the strangers where all other
things were at home. Moving constantly in and out of his talk was Old Man
Willow, and Frodo learned now enough to content him, indeed more than enough,
for it was not comfortable lore. Tom's words laid bare the hearts of trees and
their thoughts, which were often dark and strange, and filled with a hatred of
things that go free upon the earth, gnawing, biting, breaking, hacking,
burning: destroyers and usurpers. It was not called the Old Forest without
reason, for it was indeed ancient, a survivor of vast forgotten woods; and in
it there lived yet, ageing no quicker than the hills, the fathers of the
fathers of trees, remembering times when they were lords. The countless years
had filled them with pride and rooted wisdom, and with malice. But none were
more dangerous than the Great Willow: his heart was rotten, but his strength
was green; and he was cunning, and a master of winds, and his song and thought
ran through the woods on both sides of the river. His grey thirsty spirit drew
power out of the earth and spread like fine root-threads in the ground, and
invisible twig-fingers in the air, till it had under its dominion nearly all
the trees of the Forest from the Hedge to the Downs.
 Suddenly Tom's talk left the woods and went leaping up the young stream,
over bubbling waterfalls, over pebbles and worn rocks, and among small flowers
in close grass and wet crannies, wandering at last up on to the Downs. They
heard of the Great Barrows, and the green mounds, and the stone-rings upon the
hills and in the hollows among the hills. Sheep were bleating in flocks. Green
walls and white walls rose. There were fortresses on the heights. Kings of
little kingdoms fought together, and the young Sun shone like fire on the red
metal of their new and greedy swords. There was victory and defeat; and towers
fell, fortresses were burned, and flames went up into the sky. Gold was piled
on the biers of dead kings and queens; and mounds covered them, and the stone
doors were shut; and the grass grew over all. Sheep walked for a while biting
the grass, but soon the hills were empty again. A shadow came out of dark
places far away, and the bones were stirred in the mounds. Barrow-wights
walked in the hollow places with a clink of rings on cold fingers, and gold
chains in the wind.' Stone rings grinned out of the ground like broken teeth
in the moonlight.
 The hobbits shuddered. Even in the Shire the rumour of the Barrow-wights
of the Barrow-downs beyond the Forest had been heard. But it was not a tale
that any hobbit liked to listen to, even by a comfortable fireside far away.
These four now suddenly remembered what the joy of this house had driven from
their minds: the house of Tom Bombadil nestled under the very shoulder of
those dreaded hills. They lost the thread of his tale and shifted uneasily,
looking aside at one another.
 When they caught his words again they found that he had now wandered into
strange regions beyond their memory and beyond their waking thought, into
limes when the world was wider, and the seas flowed straight to the western
Shore; and still on and back Tom went singing out into ancient starlight, when
only the Elf-sires were awake. Then suddenly he slopped, and they saw that he
nodded as if he was falling asleep. The hobbits sat still before him,
enchanted; and it seemed as if, under the spell of his words, the wind had
gone, and the clouds had dried up, and the day had been withdrawn, and
darkness had come from East and West, and all the sky was filled with the
light of white stars.
 Whether the morning and evening of one day or of many days had passed
Frodo could not tell. He did not feel either hungry or tired, only filled with
wonder. The stars shone through the window and the silence of the heavens
seemed to be round him. He spoke at last out of his wonder and a sudden fear
of that silence:
 'Who are you, Master?' he asked.
 'Eh, what?' said Tom sitting up, and his eyes glinting in the gloom.
'Don't you know my name yet? That's the only answer. Tell me, who are you,
alone, yourself and nameless? But you are young and I am old. Eldest, that's
what I am. Mark my words, my friends: Tom was here before the river and the
trees; Tom remembers the first raindrop and the first acorn. He made paths
before the Big People, and saw the little People arriving. He was here before
the Kings and the graves and the Barrow-wights. When the Elves passed
westward, Tom was here already, before the seas were bent. He knew the dark
under the stars when it was fearless – before the Dark Lord came from
Outside.'
 A shadow seemed to pass by the window, and the hobbits glanced hastily
through the panes. When they turned again, Goldberry stood in the door behind,
framed in light. She held a candle, shielding its flame from the draught with
her hand; and the light flowed through it, like sunlight through a white
shell.
 'The rain has ended,' she said; 'and new waters are running downhill,
under the stars. Let us now laugh and be glad!'
 'And let us have food and drink!' cried Tom. 'Long tales are thirsty. And
long listening's hungry work, morning, noon, and evening!' With that he jumped
out of his chair, and with a bound took a candle from the chimney-shelf and
lit it in the flame that Goldberry held; then he danced about the table.
Suddenly he hopped through the door and disappeared.
 Quickly he returned, bearing a large and laden tray. Then Tom and
Goldberry set the table; and the hobbits sat half in wonder and half in
laughter: so fair was the grace of Goldberry and so merry and odd the
caperings of Tom. Yet in some fashion they seemed to weave a single dance,
neither hindering the other, in and out of the room, and round about the
table; and with great speed food and vessels and lights were set in order. The
boards blazed with candles, white and yellow. Tom bowed to his guests. 'Supper
is ready,' said Goldberry; and now the hobbits saw that she was clothed all in
silver with a white girdle, and her shoes were like fishes' mail. But Tom was
all in clean blue, blue as rain-washed forget-me-nots, and he had green
stockings.
 It was a supper even better than before. The hobbits under the spell of
Tom's words may have missed one meal or many, but when the food was before
them it seemed at least a week since they had eaten. They did not sing or even
speak much for a while, and paid close attention to business. But after a time
their hearts and spirit rose high again, and their voices rang out in mirth
and laughter.
 After they had eaten, Goldberry sang many songs for them, songs that
began merrily in the hills and fell softly down into silence; and in the
silences they saw in their minds pools and waters wider than any they had
known, and looking into them they saw the sky below them and the stars like
jewels in the depths. Then once more she wished them each good night and left
them by the fireside. But Tom now seemed wide awake and plied them with
questions.
 He appeared already to know much about them and all their families, and
indeed to know much of all the history and doings of the Shire down from days
hardly remembered among the hobbits themselves. It no longer surprised them;
but he made no secret that he owed his recent knowledge largely to Farmer
Maggot, whom he seemed to regard as a person of more importance than they had
imagined. 'There's earth under his old feet, and clay on his fingers; wisdom
in his bones, and both his eyes are open,' said Tom. It was also clear that
Tom had dealings with the Elves, and it seemed that in some fashion, news had
reached him from Gildor concerning the flight of Frodo.
 Indeed so much did Tom know, and so cunning was his questioning, that
Frodo found himself telling him more about Bilbo and his own hopes and fears
than he had told before even to Gandalf. Tom wagged his head up and down, and
there was a glint in his eyes when he heard of the Riders.
 'Show me the precious Ring!' he said suddenly in the midst of the story:
and Frodo, to his own astonishment, drew out the chain from his pocket, and
unfastening the Ring handed it at once to Tom.
 It seemed to grow larger as it lay for a moment on his big brown-skinned
hand. Then suddenly he put it to his eye and laughed. For a second the hobbits
had a vision, both comical and alarming, of his bright blue eye gleaming
through a circle of gold. Then Tom put the Ring round the end of his little
finger and held it up to the candlelight. For a moment the hobbits noticed
nothing strange about this. Then they gasped. There was no sign of Tom
disappearing!
 Tom laughed again, and then he spun the Ring in the air – and it vanished
with a flash. Frodo gave a cry – and Tom leaned forward and handed it back to
him with a smile.
 Frodo looked at it closely, and rather suspiciously (like one who has
lent a trinket to a juggler). It was the same Ring, or looked the same and
weighed the same: for that Ring had always seemed to Frodo to weigh strangely
heavy in the hand. But something prompted him to make sure. He was perhaps a
trifle annoyed with Tom for seeming to make so light of what even Gandalf
thought so perilously important. He waited for an opportunity, when the talk
was going again, and Tom was telling an absurd story about badgers and their
queer ways – then he slipped the Ring on.
 Merry turned towards him to say something and gave a start, and checked
an exclamation. Frodo was delighted (in a way): it was his own ring all right,
for Merry was staring blankly at his chair, and obviously could not see him.
He got up and crept quietly away from the fireside towards the outer door.
 'Hey there!' cried Tom, glancing towards him with a most seeing look in
his shining eyes. 'Hey! Come Frodo, there! Where be you a-going? Old Tom
Bombadil's not as blind as that yet. Take off your golden ring! Your hand's
more fair without it. Come back! Leave your game and sit down beside me! We
must talk a while more, and think about the morning. Tom must teach the right
road, and keep your feet from wandering.'
 Frodo laughed (trying to feel pleased), and taking off the Ring he came
and sat down again. Tom now told them that he reckoned the Sun would shine
tomorrow, and it would be a glad morning, and setting out would be hopeful.
But they would do well to start early; for weather in that country was a thing
that even Tom could not be sure of for long, and it would change sometimes
quicker than he could change his jacket. 'I am no weather-master,' he said;
'nor is aught that goes on two legs.'
 By his advice they decided to make nearly due North from his house, over
the western and lower slopes of the Downs: they might hope in that way to
strike the East Road in a day's journey, and avoid the Barrows. He told them
not to be afraid – but to mind their own business.
 'Keep to the green grass. Don't you go a-meddling with old stone or cold
Wights or prying in their houses, unless you be strong folk with hearts that
never falter!' He said this more than once; and he advised them to pass
barrows by on the west-side, if they chanced to stray near one. Then he taught
them a rhyme to sing, if they should by ill-luck fall into any danger or
difficulty the next day.
 Ho! Tom Bombadil, Tom Bombadillo!
 By water, wood and hill, by the reed and willow,
 By fire, sun and moon, harken now and hear us!
 Come, Tom Bombadil, for our need is near us!
 When they had sung this altogether after him, he clapped them each on the
shoulder with a laugh, and taking candles led them back to their bedroom.
 _Chapter 8_
 Fog on the Barrow-Downs
 That night they heard no noises. But either in his dreams or out of them,
he could not tell which, Frodo heard a sweet singing running in his mind; a
song that seemed to come like a pale light behind a grey rain-curtain, and
growing stronger to turn the veil all to glass and silver, until at last it
was rolled back, and a far green country opened before him under a swift
sunrise.
 The vision melted into waking; and there was Tom whistling like a treefull of birds; and the sun was
already slanting down the hill and through the
open window. Outside everything was green and pale gold.
 After breakfast, which they again ate alone, they made ready to say
farewell, as nearly heavy of heart as was possible on such a morning: cool,
bright, and clean under a washed autumn sky of thin blue. The air came fresh
from the North-west. Their quiet ponies were almost frisky, sniffing and
moving restlessly. Tom came out of the house and waved his hat and danced upon
the doorstep, bidding the hobbits to get up and be off and go with good speed.
 They rode off along a path that wound away from behind the house, and
went slanting up towards the north end of the hill-brow under which it
sheltered. They had just dismounted to lead their ponies up the last steep
slope, when suddenly Frodo stopped.
 'Goldberry!' he cried. 'My fair lady, clad all in silver green! We have
never said farewell to her, nor seen her since the evening!' He was so
distressed that he turned back; but at that moment a clear call came rippling
down. There on the hill-brow she stood beckoning to them: her hair was flying
loose, and as it caught the sun it shone and shimmered. A light like the glint
of water on dewy grass flashed from under her feet as she danced.
 They hastened up the last slope, and stood breathless beside her. They
bowed, but with a wave of her arm she bade them look round; and they looked
out from the hill-top over lands under the morning. It was now as clear and
far-seen as it had been veiled and misty when they stood upon the knoll in the
Forest, which could now be seen rising pale and green out of the dark trees in
the West. In that direction the land rose in wooded ridges, green, yellow,
russet under the sun, beyond which lay hidden the valley of the Brandywine. To
the South, over the line of the Withywindle, there was a distant glint like
pale glass where the Brandywine River made a great loop in the lowlands and
flowed away out of the knowledge of the hobbits. Northward beyond the
dwindling downs the land ran away in flats and swellings of grey and green and
pale earth-colours, until it faded into a featureless and shadowy distance.
Eastward the Barrow-downs rose, ridge behind ridge into the morning, and
vanished out of eyesight into a guess: it was no more than a guess of blue and
a remote white glimmer blending with the hem of the sky, but it spoke to them,
out of memory and old tales, of the high and distant mountains.
 They took a deep draught of the air, and felt that a skip and a few stout
strides would bear them wherever they wished. It seemed fainthearted to go
jogging aside over the crumpled skirts of the downs towards the Road, when
they should be leaping, as lusty as Tom, over the stepping stones of the hills
straight towards the Mountains.
 Goldberry spoke to them and recalled their eyes and thoughts. 'Speed now,
fair guests!' she said. 'And hold to your purpose! North with the wind in the
left eye and a blessing on your footsteps! Make haste while the Sun shines!'
And to Frodo she said: 'Farewell, Elf-friend, it was a merry meeting!'
 But Frodo found no words to answer. He bowed low, and mounted his pony,
and followed by his friends jogged slowly down the gentle slope behind the
hill. Tom Bombadil's house and the valley, and the Forest were lost to view.
The air grew warmer between the green walls of hillside and hillside, and the
scent of turf rose strong and sweet as they breathed. Turning back, when they
reached the bottom of the green hollow, they saw Goldberry, now small and
slender like a sunlit flower against the sky: she was standing still watching
them, and her hands were stretched out towards them. As they looked she gave a
clear call, and lifting up her hand she turned and vanished behind the hill.
 Their way wound along the floor of the hollow, and round the green feet
of a steep hill into another deeper and broader valley, and then over the
shoulder of further hills, and down their long limbs, and up their smooth
sides again, up on to new hill-tops and down into new valleys. There was no
tree nor any visible water: it was a country of grass and short springy turf,
silent except for the whisper of the air over the edges of the land, and high
lonely cries of strange birds. As they journeyed the sun mounted, and grew
hot. Each time they climbed a ridge the breeze seemed to have grown less. When
they caught a glimpse of the country westward the distant Forest seemed to be
smoking, as if the fallen rain was steaming up again from leaf and root and
mould. A shadow now lay round the edge of sight, a dark haze above which the
upper sky was like a blue cap, hot and heavy.
 About mid-day they came to a hill whose top was wide and flattened, like
a shallow saucer with a green mounded rim. Inside there was no air stirring,
and the sky seemed near their heads. They rode across and looked northwards.
Then their hearts rose, for it seemed plain that they had come further already
than they had expected. Certainly the distances had now all become hazy and
deceptive, but there could be no doubt that the Downs were coming to an end. A
long valley lay below them winding away northwards, until it came to an
opening between two steep shoulders. Beyond, there seemed to be no more hills.
Due north they faintly glimpsed a long dark line. That is a line of trees,'
said Merry, 'and that must mark the Road. All along it for many leagues east
of the Bridge there are trees growing. Some say they were planted in the old
days.'
 'Splendid!' said Frodo. 'If we make as good going this afternoon as we
have done this morning, we shall have left the Downs before the Sun sets and
be jogging on in search of a camping place.' But even as he spoke he turned
his glance eastwards, and he saw that on that side the hills were higher and
looked down upon them; and all those hills were crowned with green mounds, and
on some were standing stones, pointing upwards like jagged teeth out of green
gums.
 That view was somehow disquieting; so they turned from the sight and went
down into the hollow circle. In the midst of it there stood a single stone,
standing tall under the sun above, and at this hour casting no shadow. It was
shapeless and yet significant: like a landmark, or a guarding finger, or more
like a warning. But they were now hungry, and the sun was still at the
fearless noon; so they set their backs against the east side of the stone. It
was cool, as if the sun had had no power to warm it; but at that time this
seemed pleasant. There they took food and drink, and made as good a noon-meal
under the open sky as anyone could wish; for the food came from 'down under
Hill'. Tom had provided them with plenty for the comfort of the day. Their
ponies unburdened strayed upon the grass.
 Riding over the hills, and eating their fill, the warm sun and the scent
of turf, lying a little too long, stretching out their legs and looking at the
sky above their noses: these things are, perhaps, enough to explain what
happened. However, that may be: they woke suddenly and uncomfortably from a
sleep they had never meant to take. The standing stone was cold, and it cast a
long pale shadow that stretched eastward over them. The sun, a pale and watery
yellow, was gleaming through the mist just above the west wall of the hollow
in which they lay; north, south, and east, beyond the wall the fog was thick,
cold and white. The air was silent, heavy and chill. Their ponies were
standing crowded together with their heads down.
 The hobbits sprang to their feet in alarm, and ran to the western rim.
They found that they were upon an island in the fog. Even as they looked out
in dismay towards the setting sun, it sank before their eyes into a white sea,
and a cold grey shadow sprang up in the East behind. The fog rolled up to the
walls and rose above them, and as it mounted it bent over their heads until it
became a roof: they were shut in a hall of mist whose central pillar was the
standing stone.
 They felt as if a trap was closing about them; but they did not quite
lose heart. They still remembered the hopeful view they had had of the line of
the Road ahead, and they still knew in which direction it lay. In any case,
they now had so great a dislike for that hollow place about the stone that no
thought of remaining there was in their minds. They packed up as quickly as
their chilled fingers would work.
 Soon they were leading their ponies in single file over the rim and down
the long northward slope of the hill, down into a foggy sea. As they went down
the mist became colder and damper, and their hair hung lank and dripping on
their foreheads. When they reached the bottom it was so cold that they halted
and got out cloaks and hoods, which soon became bedewed with grey drops. Then,
mounting their ponies, they went slowly on again, feeling their way by the
rise and fall of the ground. They were steering, as well as they could guess,
for the gate-like opening at the far northward end of the long valley which
they had seen in the morning. Once they were through the gap, they had only lo
keep on in anything like a straight line and they were bound in the end to
strike the Road. Their thoughts did not go beyond that, except for a vague
hope that perhaps away beyond the Downs there might be no fog.
 Their going was very slow. To prevent their getting separated and
wandering in different directions they went in file, with Frodo leading. Sam
was behind him, and after him came Pippin, and then Merry. The valley seemed
to stretch on endlessly. Suddenly Frodo saw a hopeful sign. On either side
ahead a darkness began to loom through the mist; and he guessed that they were
at last approaching the gap in the hills, the north-gate of the Barrow-downs.
If they could pass that, they would be free.
 'Come on! Follow me!' he called back over his shoulder, and he hurried
forward. But his hope soon changed to bewilderment and alarm. The dark patches
grew darker, but they shrank; and suddenly he saw, towering ominous before him
and leaning slightly towards one another like the pillars of a headless door,
two huge standing stones. He could not remember having seen any sign of these
in the valley, when he looked out from the hill in the morning. He had passed
between them almost before he was aware: and even as he did so darkness seemed
to fall round him. His pony reared and snorted, and he fell off. When he
looked back he found that he was alone: the others had not followed him.
'Sam!' he called. 'Pippin! Merry! Come along! Why don't you keep up?'
 There was no answer. Fear took him, and he ran back past the stones
shouting wildly: 'Sam! Sam! Merry! Pippin!' The pony bolted into the mist and
vanished. From some way off, or so it seemed, he thought he heard a cry: 'Hoy!
Frodo! Hoy!' It was away eastward, on his left as he stood under the great
stones, staring and straining into the gloom. He plunged off in the direction
of the call, and found himself going steeply uphill.
 As he struggled on he called again, and kept on calling more and more
frantically; but he heard no answer for some time, and then it seemed faint
and far ahead and high above him. 'Frodo! Hoy!' came the thin voices out of
the mist: and then a cry that sounded like _help, help!_ often repeated,
ending with a last _help!_ that trailed off into a long wail suddenly cut
short. He stumbled forward with all the speed he could towards the cries; but
the light was now gone, and clinging night had closed about him, so that it
was impossible to be sure of any direction. He seemed all the time to be
climbing up and up.
 Only the change in the level of the ground at his feet told him when he
at last came to the top of a ridge or hill. He was weary, sweating and yet
chilled. It was wholly dark.
 'Where are you?' he cried out miserably.
 There was no reply. He stood listening. He was suddenly aware that it was
getting very cold, and that up here a wind was beginning to blow, an icy wind.
A change was coming in the weather. The mist was flowing past him now in
shreds and tatters. His breath was smoking, and the darkness was less near and
thick. He looked up and saw with surprise that faint stars were appearing
overhead amid the strands of hurrying cloud and fog. The wind began to hiss
over the grass.
 He imagined suddenly that he caught a muffled cry, and he made towards
it; and even as he went forward the mist was rolled up and thrust aside, and
the starry sky was unveiled. A glance showed him that he was now facing
southwards and was on a round hill-top, which he must have climbed from the
north. Out of the east the biting wind was blowing. To his right there loomed
against the westward stars a dark black shape. A great barrow stood there.
 'Where are you?' he cried again, both angry and afraid.
 'Here!' said a voice, deep and cold, that seemed to come out of the
ground. 'I am waiting for you!'
 'No!' said Frodo; but he did not run away. His knees gave, and he fell on
the ground. Nothing happened, and there was no sound. Trembling he looked up,
in time to see a tall dark figure like a shadow against the stars. It leaned
over him. He thought there were two eyes, very cold though lit with a pale
light that seemed to come from some remote distance. Then a grip stronger and
colder than iron seized him. The icy touch froze his bones, and he remembered
no more.
 When he came to himself again, for a moment he could recall nothing
except a sense of dread. Then suddenly he knew that he was imprisoned, caught
hopelessly; he was in a barrow. A Barrow-wight had taken him, and he was
probably already under the dreadful spells of the Barrow-wights about which
whispered tales spoke. He dared not move, but lay as he found himself: flat on
his back upon a cold stone with his hands on his breast.
 But though his fear was so great that it seemed to be part of the very
darkness that was round him, he found himself as he lay thinking about Bilbo
Baggins and his stories, of their jogging along together in the lanes of the
Shire and talking about roads and adventures. There is a seed of courage
hidden (often deeply, it is true) in the heart of the fattest and most timid
hobbit, wailing for some final and desperate danger to make it grow. Frodo was
neither very fat nor very timid; indeed, though he did not know it, Bilbo (and
Gandalf) had thought him the best hobbit in the Shire. He thought he had come
to the end of his adventure, and a terrible end, but the thought hardened him.
He found himself stiffening, as if for a final spring; he no longer felt limp
like a helpless prey.
 As he lay there, thinking and getting a hold of himself, he noticed all
at once that the darkness was slowly giving way: a pale greenish light was
growing round him. It did not at first show him what kind of a place he was
in, for the light seemed to be coming out of himself, and from the floor
beside him, and had not yet reached the roof or wall. He turned, and there in
the cold glow he saw lying beside him Sam, Pippin, and Merry. They were on
their backs, and their faces looked deathly pale; and they were clad in white.
About them lay many treasures, of gold maybe, though in that light they looked
cold and unlovely. On their heads were circlets, gold chains were about their
waists, and on their fingers were many rings. Swords lay by their sides, and
shields were at their feet. But across their three necks lay one long naked
sword.
 Suddenly a song began: a cold murmur, rising and falling. The voice
seemed far away and immeasurably dreary, sometimes high in the air and thin,
sometimes like a low moan from the ground. Out of the formless stream of sad
but horrible sounds, strings of words would now and again shape themselves:
grim, hard, cold words, heartless and miserable. The night was railing against
the morning of which it was bereaved, and the cold was cursing the warmth for
which it hungered. Frodo was chilled to the marrow. After a while the song
became clearer, and with dread in his heart he perceived that it had changed
into an incantation:
 Cold be hand and heart and bone,
 and cold be sleep under stone:
 never mare to wake on stony bed,
 never, till the Sun fails and the Moon is dead.
 In the black wind the stars shall die,
 and still on gold here let them lie,
 till the dark lord lifts his hand
 over dead sea and withered land.
 He heard behind his head a creaking and scraping sound. Raising himself
on one arm he looked, and saw now in the pale light that they were in a kind
of passage which behind them turned a corner. Round the corner a long arm was
groping, walking on its fingers towards Sam, who was lying nearest, and
towards the hilt of the sword that lay upon him.
 At first Frodo felt as if he had indeed been turned into stone by the
incantation. Then a wild thought of escape came to him. He wondered if he put
on the Ring, whether the Barrow-wight would miss him, and he might find some
way out. He thought of himself running free over the grass, grieving for
Merry, and Sam, and Pippin, but free and alive himself. Gandalf would admit
that there had been nothing else he could do.
 But the courage that had been awakened in him was now too strong: he
could not leave his friends so easily. He wavered, groping in his pocket, and
then fought with himself again; and as he did so the arm crept nearer.
Suddenly resolve hardened in him, and he seized a short sword that lay beside
him, and kneeling he stooped low over the bodies of his companions. With what
strength he had he hewed at the crawling arm near the wrist, and the hand
broke off; but at the same moment the sword splintered up to the hilt. There
was a shriek and the light vanished. In the dark there was a snarling noise.
 Frodo fell forward over Merry, and Merry's face felt cold. All at once
back into his mind, from which it had disappeared with the first coming of the
fog, came the memory of the house down under the Hill, and of Tom singing. He
remembered the rhyme that Tom had taught them. In a small desperate voice he
began: _Ho! Tom Bombadil!_ and with that name his voice seemed to grow strong:
it had a full and lively sound, and the dark chamber echoed as if to drum and
trumpet.
 Ho! Tom Bombadil, Tom Bombadillo!
 By water, wood and hill, by the reed and willow,
 By fire, sun and moon, harken now and hear us!
 Come, Tom Bombadil, for our need is near us!
 There was a sudden deep silence, in which Frodo could hear his heart
beating. After a long slow moment he heard plain, but far away, as if it was
coming down through the ground or through thick walls, an answering voice
singing:
 Old Tom Bombadil is a merry fellow,
 Bright blue his jacket is, and his boots are yellow.
 None has ever caught him yet, for Tom, he is the master:
 His songs are stronger songs, and his feet are faster.
 There was a loud rumbling sound, as of stones rolling and falling, and
suddenly light streamed in, real light, the plain light of day. A low doorlike opening appeared at the end
of the chamber beyond Frodo's feet; and there
was Tom's head (hat, feather, and all) framed against the light of the sun
rising red behind him. The light fell upon the floor, and upon the faces of
the three hobbits lying beside Frodo. They did not stir, but the sickly hue
had left them. They looked now as if they were only very deeply asleep.
 Tom stooped, removed his hat, and came into the dark chamber, singing:
 Get out, you old Wight! Vanish in the sunlight!
 Shrivel like the cold mist, like the winds go wailing,
 Out into the barren lands far beyond the mountains!
 Come never here again! Leave your barrow empty!
 Lost and forgotten be, darker than the darkness,
 Where gates stand for ever shut, till the world is mended.
 At these words there was a cry and part of the inner end of the chamber
fell in with a crash. Then there was a long trailing shriek, fading away into
an unguessable distance; and after that silence.
 'Come, friend Frodo!' said Tom. 'Let us get out on to clean grass! You
must help me bear them.'
 Together they carried out Merry, Pippin, and Sam. As Frodo left the
barrow for the last time he thought he saw a severed hand wriggling still,
like a wounded spider, in a heap of fallen earth. Tom went back in again, and
there was a sound of much thumping and stamping. When he came out he was
bearing in his arms a great load of treasure: things of gold, silver, copper,
and bronze; many beads and chains and jewelled ornaments. He climbed the green
barrow and laid them all on top in the sunshine.
 There he stood, with his hat in his hand and the wind in his hair, and
looked down upon the three hobbits, that had been laid on their backs upon the
grass at the west side of the mound. Raising his right hand he said in a clear
and commanding voice:
 Wake now my merry tads! Wake and hear me calling!
 Warm now be heart and limb! The cold stone is fallen;
 Dark door is standing wide; dead hand is broken.
 Night under Night is flown, and the Gate is open!
 To Frodo's great joy the hobbits stirred, stretched their arms, rubbed
their eyes, and then suddenly sprang up. They looked about in amazement, first
at Frodo, and then at Tom standing large as life on the barrow-top above them;
and then at themselves in their thin white rags, crowned and belted with pale
gold, and jingling with trinkets.
 'What in the name of wonder?' began Merry, feeling the golden circlet
that had slipped over one eye. Then he stopped, and a shadow came over his
face, and he closed his eyes. 'Of course, I remember!' he said. 'The men of
Carn Dûm came on us at night, and we were worsted. Ah! the spear in my
heart!' He clutched at his breast. 'No! No!' he said, opening his eyes. 'What
am I saying? I have been dreaming. Where did you get to, Frodo?'
 'I thought that I was lost,' said Frodo; 'but I don't want to speak of
it. Let us think of what we are to do now! Let us go on!'
 'Dressed up like this, sir?' said Sam. 'Where are my clothes?' He flung
his circlet, belt, and rings on the grass, and looked round helplessly, as if
he expected to find his cloak, jacket, and breeches, and other hobbit-garments
lying somewhere to hand.
 'You won't find your clothes again,' said Tom, bounding down from the
mound, and laughing as he danced round them in the sunlight. One would have
thought that nothing dangerous or dreadful had happened; and indeed the horror
faded out of their hearts as they looked at him, and saw the merry glint in
his eyes.
 'What do you mean?' asked Pippin, looking at him, half puzzled and half
amused. 'Why not?'
 But Tom shook his head, saying: 'You've found yourselves again, out of
the deep water. Clothes are but little loss, if you escape from drowning. Be
glad, my merry friends, and let the warm sunlight heal now heart and limb!
Cast off these cold rags! Run naked on the grass, while Tom goes a-hunting!'
 He sprang away down hill, whistling and calling. Looking down after him
Frodo saw him running away southwards along the green hollow between their
hill and the next, still whistling and crying:
 Hey! now! Come hoy now! Whither do you wander?
 Up, down, near or far, here, there or yonder?
 Sharp-ears, Wise-nose, Swish-tail and Bumpkin,
 White-socks my little lad, and old Fatty Lumpkin!
 So he sang, running fast, tossing up his hat and catching it, until he
was hidden by a fold of the ground: but for some time his _hey now! hoy now!
_came floating back down the wind, which had shifted round towards the south.
 The air was growing very warm again. The hobbits ran about for a while on
the grass, as he told them. Then they lay basking in the sun with the delight
of those that have been wafted suddenly from bitter winter to a friendly
clime, or of people that, after being long ill and bedridden, wake one day to
find that they are unexpectedly well and the day is again full of promise.
 By the time that Tom returned they were feeling strong (and hungry). He
reappeared, hat first, over the brow of the hill, and behind him came in an
obedient line _six_ ponies: their own five and one more. The last was plainly
old Fatty Lumpkin: he was larger, stronger, fatter (and older) than their own
ponies. Merry, to whom the others belonged, had not, in fact, given them any
such names, but they answered to the new names that Tom had given them for the
rest of their lives. Tom called them one by one and they climbed over the brow
and stood in a line. Then Tom bowed to the hobbits.
 'Here are your ponies, now!' he said. 'They've more sense (in some ways)
than you wandering hobbits have – more sense in their noses. For they sniff
danger ahead which you walk right into; and if they run to save themselves,
then they run the right way. You must forgive them all; for though their
hearts are faithful, to face fear of Barrow-wights is not what they were made
for. See, here they come again, bringing all their burdens!'
 Merry, Sam, and Pippin now clothed themselves in spare garments from
their packs; and they soon felt too hot, for they were obliged to put on some
of the thicker and warmer things that they had brought against the oncoming of
winter.
 'Where does that other old animal, that Fatty Lumpkin, come from?' asked
Frodo.
 'He's mine,' said Tom. 'My four-legged friend; though I seldom ride him,
and he wanders often far, free upon the hillsides. When your ponies stayed
with me, they got to know my Lumpkin; and they smelt him in the night, and
quickly ran to meet him. I thought he'd look for them and with his words of
wisdom take all their fear away. But now, my jolly Lumpkin, old Tom's going to
ride. Hey! he's coming with you, just to set you on the road; so he needs a
pony. For you cannot easily talk to hobbits that are riding, when you're on
your own legs trying to trot beside them.'
 The hobbits were delighted to hear this, and thanked Tom many times; but
he laughed, and said that they were so good at losing themselves that he would
not feel happy till he had seen them safe over the borders of his land. 'I've
got things to do,' he said: 'my making and my singing, my talking and my
walking, and my watching of the country. Tom can't be always near to open
doors and willow-cracks. Tom has his house to mind, and Goldberry is waiting.'
 It was still fairly early by the sun, something between nine and ten, and
the hobbits turned their minds to food. Their last meal had been lunch beside
the standing stone the day before. They breakfasted now off the remainder of
Tom's provisions, meant for their supper, with additions that Tom had brought
with him. It was not a large meal (considering hobbits and the circumstances),
but they felt much better for it. While they were eating Tom went up to the
mound, and looked through the treasures. Most of these he made into a pile
that glistened and sparkled on the grass. He bade them lie there 'free to all
finders, birds, beasts. Elves or Men, and all kindly creatures'; for so the
spell of the mound should be broken and scattered and no Wight ever come back
to it. He chose for himself from the pile a brooch set with blue stones, manyshaded like flax-flowers or
the wings of blue butterflies. He looked long at
it, as if stirred by some memory, shaking his head, and saying at last:
 'Here is a pretty toy for Tom and for his lady! Fair was she who long ago
wore this on her shoulder. Goldberry shall wear it now, and we will not forget
her!'
 For each of the hobbits he chose a dagger, long, leaf-shaped, and keen,
of marvellous workmanship, damasked with serpent-forms in red and gold. They
gleamed as he drew them from their black sheaths, wrought of some strange
metal, light and strong, and set with many fiery stones. Whether by some
virtue in these sheaths or because of the spell that lay on the mound, the
blades seemed untouched by time, unrusted, sharp, glittering in the sun.
 'Old knives are long enough as swords for hobbit-people,' he said. 'Sharp
blades are good to have, if Shire-folk go walking, east, south, or far away
into dark and danger.' Then he told them that these blades were forged many
long years ago by Men of Westernesse: they were foes of the Dark Lord, but
they were overcome by the evil king of Carn Dûm in the Land of Angmar.
 'Few now remember them,' Tom murmured, 'yet still some go wandering, sons
of forgotten kings walking in loneliness, guarding from evil things folk that
are heedless.'
 The hobbits did not understand his words, but as he spoke they had a
vision as it were of a great expanse of years behind them, like a vast shadowy
plain over which there strode shapes of Men, tall and grim with bright swords,
and last came one with a star on his brow. Then the vision faded, and they
were back in the sunlit world. It was time to start again. They made ready,
packing their bags and lading their ponies. Their new weapons they hung on
their leather belts under their jackets, feeling them very awkward, and
wondering if they would be of any use. Fighting had not before occurred to any
of them as one of the adventures in which their flight would land them.
 At last they set off. They led their ponies down the hill; and then
mounting they trotted quickly along the valley. They looked back and saw the
top of the old mound on the hill, and from it the sunlight on the gold went up
like a yellow flame. Then they turned a shoulder of the Downs and it was
hidden from view.
 Though Frodo looked about him on every side he saw no sign of the great
stones standing like a gate, and before long they came to the northern gap and
rode swiftly through, and the land fell away before them. It was a merry
journey with Tom Bombadil trotting gaily beside them, or before them, on Fatty
Lumpkin, who could move much faster than his girth promised. Tom sang most of
the time, but it was chiefly nonsense, or else perhaps a strange language
unknown to the hobbits, an ancient language whose words were mainly those of
wonder and delight.
 They went forward steadily, but they soon saw that the Road was further
away than they had imagined. Even without a fog, their sleep at mid-day would
have prevented them from reaching it until after nightfall on the day before.
The dark line they had seen was not a line of trees but a line of bushes
growing on the edge of a deep dike with a steep wall on the further side. Tom
said that it had once been the boundary of a kingdom, but a very long lime
ago. He seemed to remember something sad about it, and would not say much.
 They climbed down and out of the dike and through a gap in the wall, and
then Tom turned due north, for they had been bearing somewhat to the west. The
land was now open and fairly level, and they quickened their pace, but the sun
was already sinking low when at last they saw a line of tall trees ahead, and
they knew that they had come back to the Road after many unexpected
adventures. They galloped their ponies over the last furlongs, and halted
under the long shadows of the trees. They were on the top of a sloping bank,
and the Road, now dim as evening drew on, wound away below them. At this point
it ran nearly from South-west to North-east, and on their right it fell
quickly down into a wide hollow. It was rutted and bore many signs of the
recent heavy rain; there were pools and pot-holes full of water. They rode
down the bank and looked up and down. There was nothing to be seen. 'Well,
here we are again at last!' said Frodo. 'I suppose we haven't lost more than
two days by my short cut through the Forest! But perhaps the delay will prove
useful – it may have put them off our trail.'
 The others looked at him. The shadow of the fear of the Black Riders came
suddenly over them again. Ever since they had entered the Forest they had
thought chiefly of getting back to the Road; only now when it lay beneath
their feet did they remember the danger which pursued them, and was more than
likely to be lying in wait for them upon the Road itself. They looked
anxiously back towards the setting sun, but the Road was brown and empty.
 'Do you think,' asked Pippin hesitatingly, 'do you think we may be
pursued, tonight?'
 'No, I hope not tonight,' answered Tom Bombadil; 'nor perhaps the next
day. But do not trust my guess; for I cannot tell for certain. Out east my
knowledge fails. Tom is not master of Riders from the Black Land far beyond
his country.'
 All the same the hobbits wished he was coming with them. They felt that
he would know how to deal with Black Riders, if anyone did. They would soon
now be going forward into lands wholly strange to them, and beyond all but the
most vague and distant legends of the Shire, and in the gathering twilight
they longed for home. A deep loneliness and sense of loss was on them. They
stood silent, reluctant to make the final parting, and only slowly became
aware that Tom was wishing them farewell, and telling them to have good heart
and to ride on till dark without halting.
 'Tom will give you good advice, till this day is over (after that your
own luck must go with you and guide you): four miles along the Road you'll
come upon a village, Bree under Bree-hill, with doors looking westward. There
you'll find an old inn that is called _The Prancing Pony._ Barliman Butterbur
is the worthy keeper. There you can stay the night, and afterwards the morning
will speed you upon your way. Be bold, but wary! Keep up your merry hearts,
and ride to meet your fortune!'
 They begged him to come at least as far as the inn and drink once more
with them; but he laughed and refused, saying:
 Tom's country ends here: he will not pass the borders.
 Tom has his house to mind, and Goldberry is waiting!
 Then he turned, tossed up his hat, leaped on Lumpkin's back, and rode up
over the bank and away singing into the dusk.
 The hobbits climbed up and watched him until he was out of sight.
 'I am sorry to take leave of Master Bombadil,' said Sam. 'He's a caution
and no mistake. I reckon we may go a good deal further and see naught better,
nor queerer. But I won't deny I'll be glad to see this _Prancing Pony_he spoke
of. I hope it'll be like _The Green Dragon_ away back home! What sort of folk
are they in Bree?'
 'There are hobbits in Bree,' said Merry, 'as well as Big Folk. I daresay
it will be homelike enough. _The Pony_ is a good inn by all accounts. My
people ride out there now and again.'
 'It may be all we could wish,' said Frodo; 'but it is outside the Shire
all the same. Don't make yourselves too much at home! Please remember -all of
you – that the name of Baggins must NOT be mentioned. I am Mr. Underhill, if
any name must be given.'
 They now mounted their ponies and rode off silently into the evening.
Darkness came down quickly, as they plodded slowly downhill and up again,
until at last they saw lights twinkling some distance ahead.
 Before them rose Bree-hill barring the way, a dark mass against misty
stars; and under its western flank nestled a large village. Towards it they
now hurried desiring only to find a fire, and a door between them and the
night.
 _Chapter 9_
 At the Sign of
 The Prancing Pony_
 Bree was the chief village of the Bree-land, a small inhabited region,
like an island in the empty lands round about. Besides Bree itself, there was
Staddle on the other side of the hill, Combe in a deep valley a little further
eastward, and Archet on the edge of the Chetwood. Lying round Bree-hill and
the villages was a small country of fields and tamed woodland only a few miles
broad.
 The Men of Bree were brown-haired, broad, and rather short, cheerful and
independent: they belonged to nobody but themselves; but they were more
friendly and familiar with Hobbits, Dwarves, Elves, and other inhabitants of
the world about them than was (or is) usual with Big People. According to
their own tales they were the original inhabitants and were the descendants of
the first Men that ever wandered into the West of the middle-world. Few had
survived the turmoils of the Elder Days; but when the Kings returned again
over the Great Sea they had found the Bree-men still there, and they were
still there now, when the memory of the old Kings had faded into the grass.
 In those days no other Men had settled dwellings so far west, or within a
hundred leagues of the Shire. But in the wild lands beyond Bree there were
mysterious wanderers. The Bree-folk called them Rangers, and knew nothing of
their origin. They were taller and darker than the Men of Bree and were
believed to have strange powers of sight and hearing, and to understand the
languages of beasts and birds. They roamed at will southwards, and eastwards
even as far as the Misty Mountains; but they were now few and rarely seen.
When they appeared they brought news from afar, and told strange forgotten
tales which were eagerly listened to; but the Bree-folk did not make friends
of them.
 There were also many families of hobbits in the Bree-land and
_they_claimed to be the oldest settlement of Hobbits in the world, one that
was founded long before even the Brandywine was crossed and the Shire
colonized. They lived mostly in Staddle though there were some in Bree itself,
especially on the higher slopes of the hill, above the houses of the Men. The
Big Folk and the Little Folk (as they called one another) were on friendly
terms, minding their own affairs in their own ways, but both rightly regarding
themselves as necessary parts of the Bree-folk. Nowhere else in the world was
this peculiar (but excellent) arrangement to be found.
 The Bree-folk, Big and Little, did not themselves travel much; and the
affairs of the four villages were their chief concern. Occasionally the
Hobbits of Bree went as far as Buckland, or the Eastfarthing; but though their
link land was not much further than a day's riding east of the Brandywine
Bridge, the Hobbits of the Shire now seldom visited it. An occasional
Bucklander or adventurous Took would come out to the Inn for a night or two,
but even that was becoming less and less usual. The Shire-hobbits referred to
those of Bree, and to any others that lived beyond the borders, as Outsiders,
and took very little interest in them, considering them dull and uncouth.
There were probably many more Outsiders scattered about in the West of the
World in those days than the people of the Shire imagined. Some, doubtless,
were no better than tramps, ready to dig a hole in any bank and stay only as
long as it suited them. But in the Bree-land, at any rate, the hobbits were
decent and prosperous, and no more rustic than most of their distant relatives
Inside. It was not yet forgotten that there had been a time when there was
much coming and going between the Shire and Bree. There was Bree-blood in the
Brandybucks by all accounts.
 The village of Bree had some hundred stone houses of the Big Folk, mostly
above the Road, nestling on the hillside with windows looking west. On that
side, running in more than half a circle from the hill and back to it, there
was a deep dike with a thick hedge on the inner side. Over this the Road
crossed by a causeway; but where it pierced the hedge it was barred by a great
gate. There was another gate in the southern comer where the Road ran out of
the village. The gates were closed at nightfall; but just inside them were
small lodges for the gatekeepers.
 Down on the Road, where it swept to the right to go round the foot of the
hill, there was a large inn. It had been built long ago when the traffic on
the roads had been far greater. For Bree stood at an old meeting of ways;
another ancient road crossed the East Road just outside (he dike at the
western end of the village, and in former days Men and other folk of various
sorts had travelled much on it. _Strange as News from Bree_ was still a saying
in the Eastfarthing, descending from those days, when news from North, South,
and East could be heard in the inn, and when the Shire-hobbits used to go more
often to hear it. But the Northern Lands had long been desolate, and the North
Road was now seldom used: it was grass-grown, and the Bree-folk called it the
Greenway.
 The Inn of Bree was still there, however, and the innkeeper was an
important person. His house was a meeting place for the idle, talkative, and
inquisitive among the inhabitants, large and small, of the four villages; and
a resort of Rangers and other wanderers, and for such travellers (mostly
dwarves) as still journeyed on the East Road, to and from the Mountains.
 It was dark, and white stars were shining, when Frodo and his companions
came at last to the Greenway-crossing and drew near the village. They came to
the West-gate and found it shut, but at the door of the lodge beyond it, there
was a man sitting. He jumped up and fetched a lantern and looked over the gate
at them in surprise.
 'What do you want, and where do you come from?' he asked gruffly.
 'We are making for the inn here,' answered Frodo. 'We are journeying east
and cannot go further tonight.'
 'Hobbits! Four hobbits! And what's more, out of the Shire by their
talk,' said the gatekeeper, softly as if speaking to himself. He stared at
them darkly for a moment, and then slowly opened the gate and let them ride
through.
 'We don't often see Shire-folk riding on the Road at night,' he went on,
as they halted a moment by his door. 'You'll pardon my wondering what business
takes you away east of Bree! What may your names be, might I ask?'
 'Our names and our business are our own, and this does not seem a good
place to discuss them,' said Frodo, not liking the look of the man or the tone
of his voice.
 'Your business is your own, no doubt,' said the man; 'but it's my
business to ask questions after nightfall.'
 'We are hobbits from Buckland, and we have a fancy to travel and to stay
at the inn here,' put in Merry. 'I am Mr. Brandybuck. Is that enough for you?
The Bree-folk used to be fair-spoken to travellers, or so I had heard.'
 'All right, all right!' said the man. 'I meant no offence. But you'll
find maybe that more folk than old Harry at the gate will be asking you
questions. There's queer folk about. If you go on to _The Pony,_ you'll find
you're oat the only guests.'
 He wished them good night, and they said no more; but Frodo could see in
the lantern-light that the man was still eyeing them curiously. He was glad to
hear the gate clang to behind them, as they rode forward. He wondered why the
man was so suspicious, and whether any one had been asking for _news of_ a
party of hobbits. Could it have been Gandalf? He might have arrived, while
they were delayed in the Forest and the Downs. But there was something in the
look and the voice of the gatekeeper that made him uneasy.
 The man stared after the hobbits for a moment, and then he went back to
his house. As soon as his back was turned, a dark figure climbed quickly in
over the gate and melted into the shadows of the village street.
 The hobbits rode on up a gentle slope, passing a few detached houses, and
drew up outside the inn. The houses looked large and strange to them. Sam
stared up at the inn with its three storeys and many windows, and felt his
heart sink. He had imagined himself meeting giants taller than trees, and
other creatures even more terrifying, some time or other in the course of his
journey; but at the moment he was finding his first sight of Men and their
tall houses quite enough, indeed too much for the dark end of a tiring day. He
pictured black horses standing all saddled in the shadows of the inn-yard, and
Black Riders peering out of dark upper windows.
 'We surely aren't going to stay here for the night, are we, sir?' he
exclaimed. 'If there are hobbit-folk in these pans, why don't we look for some
that would be willing to take us in? It would be more homelike.'
 'What's wrong with the inn?' said Frodo. 'Tom Bombadil recommended it. I
expect it's homelike enough inside.'
 Even from the outside the inn looked a pleasant house to familiar eyes.
It had a front on the Road, and two wings running back on land partly cut out
of the lower slopes of the hill, so that at the rear the second-floor windows
were level with the ground. There was a wide arch leading to a courtyard
between the two wings, and on the left under the arch there was a large
doorway reached by a few broad steps. The door was open and light streamed out
of it. Above the arch there was a lamp, and beneath it swung a large
signboard: a fat white pony reared up on its hind legs. Over the door was
painted in white letters: THE PRANCING PONY by BARLIMAN BUTTERBUR. Many of the
lower windows showed lights behind thick curtains.
 As they hesitated outside in the gloom, someone began singing a merry
song inside, and many cheerful voices joined loudly in the chorus. They
listened to this encouraging sound for a moment and then got off their ponies.
The song ended and there was a burst of laughter and clapping.
 They led their ponies under the arch, and leaving them standing in the
yard they climbed up the steps. Frodo went forward and nearly bumped into a
short fat man with a bald head and a red face. He had a white apron on, and
was bustling out of one door and in through another, carrying a tray laden
with full mugs.
 'Can we-' began Frodo.
 'Half a minute, if you please!' shouted the man over his shoulder, and
vanished into a babel of voices and a cloud of smoke. In a moment he was out
again, wiping his hands on his apron.
 'Good evening, little master!' he said, bending down. 'What may you be
wanting?'
 'Beds for four, and stabling for five ponies, if that can be managed. Are
you Mr. Butterbur?'
 'That's right! Barliman is my name. Barliman Butterbur at your service!
You're from the Shire, eh?' he said, and then suddenly he clapped his hand to
his forehead, as if trying to remember something. 'Hobbits!' he cried. 'Now
what does that remind me of? Might I ask your names, sir?'
 'Mr. Took and Mr. Brandybuck,' said Frodo; 'and this is Sam Gamgee. My
name is Underhill.'
 'There now!' said Mr. Butterbur, snapping his fingers. 'It's gone again!
But it'll come back, when I have time to think. I'm run off my feet; but I'll
see what I can do for you. We don't often get a party out of the Shire
nowadays, and I should be sorry not to make you welcome. But there is such a
crowd already in the house tonight as there hasn't been for long enough. It
never rains but it pours, we say in Bree.
 'Hi! Nob!' he shouted. 'Where are you, you woolly-footed slow-coach?
Nob!'
 'Coming, sir! Coming!' A cheery-looking hobbit bobbed out of a door, and
seeing the travellers, stopped short and stared at them with great interest.
 'Where's Bob?' asked the landlord. 'You don't know? Well find him! Double
sharp! I haven't got six legs, nor six eyes neither! Tell Bob there's five
ponies that have to be stabled. He must find room somehow.' Nob trotted off
with a grin and a wink.
 'Well, now, what was I going to say?' said Mr. Butterbur, tapping his
forehead. 'One thing drives out another, so to speak. I'm that busy tonight,
my head is going round. There's a party that came up the Greenway from down
South last night – and that was strange enough to begin with. Then there's a
travelling company of dwarves going West come in this evening. And now there's
you. If you weren't hobbits, I doubt if we could house you. But we've got a
room or two in the north wing that were made special for hobbits, when this
place was built. On the ground floor as they usually prefer; round windows and
all as they like it. I hope you'll be comfortable. You'll be wanting supper, I
don't doubt. As soon as may be. This way now!'
 He led them a short way down a passage, and opened a door. 'Here is a
nice little parlour!' he said. 'I hope it will suit. Excuse me now. I'm that
busy. No time for talking. I must be trotting. It's hard work for two legs,
but I don't get thinner. I'll look in again later. If you want anything, ring
the hand-bell, and Nob will come. If he don't come, ring and shout!'
 Off he went at last, and left them feeling rather breathless. He seemed
capable of an endless stream of talk, however busy he might be. They found
themselves in a small and cosy room. There was a bit of bright fire burning on
the hearth, and in front of it were some low and comfortable chairs. There was
a round table, already spread with a white cloth, and on it was a large handbell. But Nob, the hobbit
servant, came bustling in long before they thought
of ringing. He brought candles and a tray full of plates.
 'Will you be wanting anything to drink, masters?' he asked. 'And shall I
show you the bedrooms, while your supper is got ready?'
 They were washed and in the middle of good deep mugs of beer when Mr.
Butterbur and Nob came in again. In a twinkling the table was laid. There was
hot soup, cold meats, a blackberry tart, new loaves, slabs of butter, and half
a ripe cheese: good plain food, as good as the Shire could show, and homelike
enough to dispel the last of Sam's misgivings (already much relieved by the
excellence of the beer).
 The landlord hovered round for a link, and then prepared to leave them.
'I don't know whether you would care to join the company, when you have
supped,' he said, standing at the door. 'Perhaps you would rather go to your
beds. Still the company would be very pleased to welcome you_,_ if you had a
mind. We don't get Outsiders – travellers from the Shire, I should say,
begging your pardon – often; and we like to hear a bit of news, or any story
or song you may have in mind. But as you please! Ring the bell, if you lack
anything!'
 So refreshed and encouraged did they feel at the end of their supper
(about three quarters of an hour's steady going, not hindered by unnecessary
talk) that Frodo, Pippin, and Sam decided to join the company. Merry said it
would be too stuffy. 'I shall sit here quietly by the fire for a bit, and
perhaps go out later for a sniff of the air. Mind your Ps and Qs, and don't
forget that you are supposed to be escaping in secret, and are still _on_ the
high-road and not very far from the Shire!'
 'All right!' said Pippin. 'Mind yourself! Don't get lost, and don't
forget that it is safer indoors!'
 The company was in the big common-room of the inn. The gathering was
large and mixed, as Frodo discovered, when his eyes got used to the light.
This came chiefly from a blazing log-fire, for the three lamps hanging from
the beams were dim, and half veiled in smoke. Barliman Butterbur was standing
near the fire, talking to a couple of dwarves and one or two strange-looking
men. On the benches were various folk: men of Bree, a collection of local
hobbits (sitting chattering together), a few more dwarves, and other vague
figures difficult to make out away in the shadows and comers.
 As soon as the Shire-hobbits entered, there was a chorus of welcome from
the Bree-landers. The strangers, especially those that had come up the
Greenway, stared at them curiously. The landlord introduced the newcomers to
the Bree-folk, so quickly that, though they caught many names, they were
seldom sure who the names belonged to. The Men of Bree seemed all to have
rather botanical (and to the Shire-folk rather odd) names, like Rushlight,
Goatleaf, Heathertoes, Appledore, Thistlewool and Ferny (not to mention
Butterbur). Some of the hobbits had similar names. The Mugworts, for instance,
seemed numerous. But most of them had natural names, such as Banks,
Brockhouse, Longholes, Sandheaver, and Tunnelly, many of which were used in
the Shire. There were several Underhills from Saddle, and as they could not
imagine sharing a name without being related, they took Frodo to their hearts
as a long-lost cousin.
 The Bree-hobbits were, in fact, friendly and inquisitive, and Frodo soon
found that some explanation of what he was doing would have to be given. He
gave out that he was interested in history and geography (at which there was
much wagging of heads, although neither of these words were much used in the
Bree-dialect). He said he was thinking of writing a book (at which there was
silent astonishment), _and_ that he and his friends wanted to collect
information about hobbits living outside the Shire, especially in the eastern
lands.
 At this a chorus of voices broke out. If Frodo had really wanted to write
a book, and had had many ears, he would have learned enough for several
chapters in a few minutes. And if that was not enough, he was given a whole
list of names, beginning with 'Old Barliman here', to whom he could go for
further information. But after a time, as Frodo did not show any _sign_ of
writing a book on the spot, the hobbits returned to their questions about
doings in the Shire. Frodo did not prove very communicative, and he soon found
himself sitting alone in a comer, listening and looking around.
 The Men and Dwarves were mostly talking of distant events and telling
flews of a kind that was becoming only too familiar. There was trouble away in
the South, and it seemed that the Men who had come up the Greenway were on the
move, looking for lands where they could find some peace. The Bree-folk were
sympathetic, but plainly not very ready to take a large number of strangers
into their little land. One of the travellers, a squint-eyed ill-favoured
fellow, was foretelling that more and more people would be coming north in the
near future. 'If room isn't found for them, they'll find it for themselves.
They've a right to live, same as other folk,' he said loudly. The local
inhabitants did not look pleased at the prospect.
 The hobbits did not pay much attention to all this, and it did not at the
moment seem to concern hobbits. Big Folk could hardly beg for lodgings in
hobbit-holes. They were more interested in Sam and Pippin, who were now
feeling quite at home, and were chatting gaily about events in the Shire.
Pippin roused a good deal of laughter with an account of the collapse of the
roof of the Town Hole in Michel Delving: Will Whitfoot, the Mayor, and the
fattest hobbit in the Westfarthing, had been buried in chalk, and came out
like a floured dumpling. But there were several questions asked that made
Frodo a little uneasy. One of the Bree-landers, who seemed to have been in the
Shire several times, wanted to know where the Underhills lived and who they
were related to.
 Suddenly Frodo noticed that a strange-looking weather-beaten man, sitting
in the shadows near the wall, was also listening intently to the hobbit-talk.
He had a tall tankard in front of him, and was smoking a long-stemmed pipe
curiously carved. His legs were stretched out before him, showing high boots
of supple leather that fitted him well, but had seen much wear and were now
caked with mud. A travel-stained cloak of heavy dark-green cloth was drawn
close about him, and in spite of the heat of the room he wore a hood that
overshadowed his face; but the gleam of his eyes could be seen as he watched
the hobbits.
 'Who is that?' Frodo asked, when he got a chance to whisper to Mr.
Butterbur. 'I don't think you introduced him?'
 'Him?' said the landlord in an answering whisper, cocking an eye without
turning his head. 'I don't rightly know. He is one of the wandering folk -
Rangers we call them. He seldom talks: not but what he can tell a rare tale
when he has the mind. He disappears for a month, or a year, and then he pops
up again. He was in and out pretty often last spring; but I haven't seen him
about lately. What his right name is I've never heard: but he's known round
here as Strider. Goes about at a great pace on his long shanks; though he
don't tell nobody what cause he has to hurry. But there's no accounting for
East and West, as we say in Bree, meaning the Rangers and the Shire-folk,
begging your pardon. Funny you should ask about him.' But at that moment Mr.
Butterbur was called away by a demand for more ale and his last remark
remained unexplained.
 Frodo found that Strider was now looking at him, as if he had heard or
guessed all that had been said. Presently, with a wave of his hand and a nod,
he invited Frodo to come over and sit by him. As Frodo drew near be threw back
his hood, showing a shaggy head of dark hair necked with grey, and in a pale
stem face a pair of keen grey eyes.
 'I am called Strider,' he said in a low voice. 'I am very pleased to meet
you. Master – Underhill, if old Butterbur got your name right.'
 'He did,' said Frodo stiffly. He felt far from comfortable under the
stare of those keen eyes.
 'Well, Master Underhill,' said Strider, 'if I were you, I should stop
your young friends from talking too much. Drink_,_ fire, and chance-meeting
are pleasant enough, but, well – this isn't the Shire. There are queer folk
about. Though I say it as shouldn't, you may think,' he added with a wry
smile, seeing Frodo's glance. 'And there have been even stranger travellers
through Bree lately,' he went on, watching Frodo's face.
 Frodo returned his gaze but said nothing; and Strider made no further
sign. His attention seemed suddenly to be fixed on Pippin. To his alarm Frodo
became aware that the ridiculous young Took, encouraged by his success with
the fat Mayor of Michel Delving, was now actually giving a comic account of
Bilbo's farewell party. He was already giving an imitation of the Speech, and
was drawing near to the astonishing Disappearance.
 Frodo was annoyed. It was a harmless enough tale for most of the local
hobbits, no doubt: just a funny story about those funny people away beyond the
River; but some (old Butterbur, for instance) knew a thing or two, and had
probably heard rumours long ago about Bilbo's vanishing. It would bring the
name of Baggins to their minds, especially if there had been inquiries in Bree
after that name.
 Frodo fidgeted, wondering what to do. Pippin was evidently much enjoying
the attention he was getting, and had become quite forgetful of their danger.
Frodo had a sudden fear that in his present mood he might even mention the
Ring; and that might well be disastrous.
 'You had better do something quick!' whispered Strider in his ear.
 Frodo jumped up and stood on a table, and began to talk. The attention of
Pippin's audience was disturbed. Some of the hobbits looked at Frodo and
laughed and clapped, thinking that Mr. Underhill had taken as much ale as was
good for him.
 Frodo suddenly felt very foolish, and found himself (as was his habit
when making a speech) fingering the things in his pocket. He felt the Ring on
its chain, and quite unaccountably the desire came over him to slip it on and
vanish out of the silly situation. It seemed to him, somehow, as if me
suggestion came to him from outside, from someone or something a the room. He
resisted the temptation firmly, and clasped the Ring in his hand, as if to
keep a hold on it and prevent it from escaping or doing _any_ mischief. At any
rate it gave him no inspiration. He spoke 'a few suitable words', as they
would have said in the Shire: _We are all very much gratified by the kindness
of your reception, and I venture to hope that my brief visit will help to
renew the old ties of friendship between the Shire and Bree;_and then he
hesitated and coughed.
 Everyone in the room was now looking at him. 'A song!' shouted one of the
hobbits. 'A song! A song!' shouted all the others. 'Come on now, master, sing
us something that we haven't heard before!'
 For a moment Frodo stood gaping. Then in desperation he began a
ridiculous song that Bilbo had been rather fond of (and indeed rather proud
of, for he had made up the words himself). It was about an inn; and that is
probably why it came into Frodo's mind just then. Here it is in full. Only a
few words of it are now, as a rule, remembered.
 There is an inn, a merry old inn
 beneath an old grey hill,
 And there they brew a beer so brown
 That the Man in the Moon himself came down
 one night to drink his fill.
 The ostler has a tipsy cat
 that plays a five-stringed fiddle;
 And up and down he runs his bow,
 Now squeaking high, now purring low,
 now sawing in the middle.
 The landlord keeps a little dog
 that is mighty fond of jokes;
 When there's good cheer among the guests,
 He cocks an ear at all the jests
 and laughs until he chokes.
 They also keep a horned cow
 as proud as any queen;
 But music turns her head like ale,
 And makes her wave her tufted tail
 and dance upon the green.
 And O! the rows of silver dishes
 and the store of silver spoons!
 For Sunday there's a special pair,
 And these they polish up with care
 on Saturday afternoons.
 The Man in the Moon was drinking deep,
 and the cat began to wail;
 A dish and a spoon on the table danced,
 The cow in the garden madly pranced,
 and the little dog chased his tail.
 The Man in the Moon took another mug,
 and then rolled beneath his chair;
 And there he dozed and dreamed of ale,
 Till in the sky the stars were pale,
 and dawn was in the air.
 Then the ostler said to his tipsy cat:
 'The white horses of the Moon,
 They neigh and champ their silver bits;
 But their master's been and drowned his wits,
 and the Sun'll be rising soon!'
 So the cat on his fiddle played hey-diddle-diddle,
 a jig that would wake the dead:
 He squeaked and sawed and quickened the tune,
While the landlord shook the Man in the Moon:
 'It's after three!' he said.
 They rolled the Man slowly up the hill
 and bundled him into the Moon,
 While his horses galloped up in rear,
 And the cow came capering like a deer,
 and a dish ran up with the spoon.
 Now quicker the fiddle went deedle-dum-diddle;
 the dog began to roar,
 The cow and the horses stood on their heads;
 The guests all bounded from their beds
 and danced upon the floor.
 With a ping and a pong the fiddle-strings broke!
 the cow jumped over the Moon,
 And the little dog laughed to see such fun,
 And the Saturday dish went off at a run
 with the silver Sunday spoon.
 The round Moon rolled behind the hill
 as the Sun raised up her head.
 She hardly believed her fiery eyes;
 For though it was day, to her surprise
 they all went back to bed!
 There was loud and long applause. Frodo had a good voice, and the song
tickled their fancy. 'Where's old Barley?' they cried. 'He ought to hear this.
Bob ought to learn his cat the fiddle, and then we'd have a dance.' They
called for more ale, and began to shout: 'Let's have it again, master! Come on
now! Once more!'
 They made Frodo have another drink, and then begin his song again, while
many of them joined in; for the tune was well known, and they were quick at
picking up words. It was now Frodo's turn to feel pleased with himself. He
capered about on the table; and when he came a second time to _the cow jumped
over the Moon,_ he leaped in the air. Much too vigorously; for he came down,
bang, into a tray full of mugs, and slipped, and rolled off the table with a
crash, clatter, and bump! The audience all opened their mouths wide for
laughter, and stopped short a gaping silence; for the singer disappeared. He
simply vanished, as if he had gone slap through the floor without leaving a
hole!
 The local hobbits stared in amazement, and then sprang to their feet and
shouted for Barliman. All the company drew away from Pippin and Sam, who found
themselves left alone in a comer, and eyed darkly and doubtfully from a
distance. It was plain that many people regarded them now as the companions of
a travelling magician of unknown powers and purpose. But there was one swarthy
Bree-lander, who stood looking at them with a knowing and half-mocking
expression that made them feel very uncomfortable. Presently he slipped out of
the door, followed by the squint-eyed southerner: the two had been whispering
together a good deal during the evening. Harry the gatekeeper also went out
just behind them..
 Frodo felt a fool. Not knowing what else to do, he crawled away under the
tables to the dark comer by Strider, who sat unmoved, giving no sign of his
thoughts. Frodo leaned back against the wall and took off the Ring. How it
came to be on his finger he could not tell. He could only suppose that he had
been handling it in his pocket while he sang, and that somehow it had slipped
on when he stuck out his hand with a jerk to save his fall. For a moment he
wondered if the Ring itself had not played him a trick; perhaps it had tried
to reveal itself in response to some wish or command that was felt in the
room. He did not like the looks of the men that had gone out.
 'Well?' said Strider, when he reappeared. 'Why did you do that? Worse
than anything your friends could have said! You have put your foot in it! Or
should I say your finger?'
 'I don't know what you mean,' said Frodo, annoyed and alarmed.
 'Oh yes, you do,' answered Strider; 'but we had better wait until the
uproar has died down. Then, if you please, Mr. _Baggins, I_ should like a
quiet word with you.'
 'What about?' asked Frodo, ignoring the sudden use of his proper name.
 'A matter of some importance – to us both,' answered Strider, looking
Frodo in the eye. 'You may hear something to your advantage.'
 'Very well,' said Frodo, trying to appear unconcerned. 'I'll talk to you
later.'
 Meanwhile an argument was going on by the fireplace. Mr. Butterbur had
come trotting in, and he was now trying to listen to several conflicting
accounts of the event at the same time.
 'I saw him, Mr. Butterbur,' said a hobbit; 'or leastways I didn't see
him, if you take my meaning. He just vanished into thin air, in a manner of
speaking.'
 'You don't say, Mr. Mugwort!' said the landlord, looking puzzled.
 'Yes I do!' replied Mugwort. 'And I mean what I say, what's more.'
 'There's some mistake somewhere,' said Butterbur, shaking his head. There
was too much of that Mr. Underhill to go vanishing into thin air; or into
thick air, as is more likely in this room.'
 'Well, where is he now?' cried several voices.
 'How should I know? He's welcome to go where he will, so long as he pays
in the morning. There's Mr. Took, now: he's not vanished.'
 'Well, I saw what I saw, and I saw what I didn't,' said Mugwort
obstinately.
 'And I say there's some mistake,' repeated Butterbur, picking up the tray
and gathering up the broken crockery.
 'Of course there's a mistake!' said Frodo. 'I haven't vanished. Here I
am! I've just been having a few words with Strider in the comer.'
 He came forward into the firelight; but most of the company backed away,
_,_ even more perturbed than before. They were not in the least satisfied by
his explanation that he had crawled away quickly under the tables after he had
fallen. Most of the Hobbits and the Men of Bree went off then and there in a
huff, having no fancy for further entertainment that evening. One or two gave
Frodo a black look and departed muttering among themselves. The Dwarves and
the two or three strange Men that still remained got up and said good night to
the landlord, but not to Frodo and his friends. Before long no one was left
but Strider, who sat on, unnoticed, by the wall.
 Mr. Butterbur did not seem much put out. He reckoned, very probably, that
his house would be full again on many future nights, until the present mystery
had been thoroughly discussed. 'Now what have you been doing, Mr. Underhill?'
he asked. 'Frightening my customers and breaking up my crocks with your
acrobatics!'
 'I am very sorry to have caused any trouble,' said Frodo. 'It was quite
unintentional, I assure you. A most unfortunate accident.'
 'All right, Mr. Underhill! But if you're going to do any more tumbling,
or conjuring, or whatever it was, you'd best warn folk beforehand – and warn
_me._ We're a bit suspicious round here of anything out of the way -uncanny,
if you understand me; and we don't take to it all of a sudden.'
 'I shan't be doing anything of the sort again, Mr. Butterbur, I promise
you. And now I think I'll be getting to bed. We shall be making an early
start. Will you see that our ponies are ready by eight o'clock?'
 'Very good! But before you go, I should like a word with you in private,
Mr. Underhill. Something has just come back to my mind that I ought to tell
you. I hope that you'll not take it amiss. When I've seen to a thing or two,
I'll come along to your room, if you're willing.'
 'Certainly!' said Frodo; but his heart sank. He wondered how many private
talks he would have before he got to bed, and what they would reveal. Were
these people all in league against him? He began to suspect even old
Butterbur's fat face of concealing dark designs.
 _Chapter 10_
 Strider
 Frodo, Pippin, and Sam made their way back to the parlour. There was no
light. Merry was not there, and the fire had burned low. It was not until they
had puffed up the embers into a blaze and thrown on a couple of faggots that
they discovered Strider had come with them. There he was calmly sitting in a
chair by the door!
 'Hallo!' said Pippin. 'Who are you, and what do you want?'
 'I am called Strider,' he answered: 'and though he may have forgotten it,
your friend promised to have a quiet talk with me.'
 'You said I might hear something to my advantage, I believe,' said Frodo.
'What have you to say?'
 'Several things,' answered Strider. 'But, of course, I have my price.'
 'What do you mean?' asked Frodo sharply.
 'Don't be alarmed! I mean just this: I will tell you what I know, and
give you some good advice – but I shall want a reward.'
 'And what will that be, pray?' said Frodo. He suspected now that he had
fallen in with a rascal, and he thought uncomfortably that he had brought only
a little money with him. All of it would hardly satisfy a rogue, and he could
not spare any of it.
 'No more than you can afford,' answered Strider with a slow smile, as if
he guessed Frodo's thoughts. 'Just this: you must take me along with you,
until I wish to leave you.'
 'Oh, indeed!' replied Frodo, surprised, but not much relieved. 'Even if I
wanted another companion, I should not agree to any such thing, until I knew a
good deal more about you, and your business.'
 'Excellent!' exclaimed Strider, crossing his legs and sitting back
comfortably. 'You seem to be coming to your senses again, and that is all to
the good. You have been much too careless so far. Very well! I will tell you
what I know, and leave the reward to you. You may be glad to grant it, when
you have heard me.'
 'Go on then!' said Frodo. 'What do you know?'
 'Too much; too many dark things,' said Strider grimly. 'But as for your
business -' He got up and went to the door, opened it quickly and looked out.
Then he shut it quietly and sat down again. 'I have quick ears,' he went on,
lowering his voice, 'and though I cannot disappear, I have hunted many wild
and wary things and I can usually avoid being seen, if I wish. Now, I was
behind the hedge this evening on the Road west of Bree, when four hobbits came
out of the Downlands. I need not repeat all that they said to old Bombadil or
to one another, but one thing interested me. _Please remember,_ said one of
them, _that the name Baggins must not be mentioned. I am Mr. Underhill, if any
name must be given._ That interested me so much that I followed them here. I
slipped over the gate just behind them. Maybe Mr. Baggins has an honest reason
for leaving his name behind; but if so, I should advise him and his friends to
be more careful.'
 'I don't see what interest my name has for any one in Bree,' said Frodo
angrily, 'and I have still to learn why it interests you. Mr. Strider may have
an honest reason for spying and eavesdropping; but if so, I should advise him
to explain it.'
 'Well answered!' said Strider laughing. 'But the explanation is simple:
 I was looking for a Hobbit called Frodo Baggins. I wanted to find him
quickly. I had learned that he was carrying out of the Shire, well, a secret
that concerned me and my friends.
 'Now, don't mistake me!' he cried, as Frodo rose from his seat, and Sam
jumped up with a scowl. 'I shall take more care of the secret than you do. And
care is needed!' He leaned forward and looked at them. 'Watch every shadow!'
he said in a low voice. 'Black horsemen have passed through Bree. On Monday
one came down the Greenway, they say; and another appeared later, coming up
the Greenway from the south.'
 There was a silence. At last Frodo spoke to Pippin and Sam: 'I ought to
have guessed it from the way the gatekeeper greeted us,' he said. 'And the
landlord seems to have heard something. Why did he press us to join the
company? And why on earth did we behave so foolishly: we ought to have stayed
quiet in here.'
 'It would have been better,' said Strider. 'I would have stopped your
going into the common-room, if I could; but the innkeeper would not let me in
to see you, or take a message.'
 'Do you think he–––' began Frodo.
 'No, I don't think any harm of old Butterbur. Only he does not altogether
like mysterious vagabonds of my sort.' Frodo gave him a puzzled look. 'Well, I
have rather a rascally look, have I not?' said Strider with a curl of his lip
and a queer gleam in his eye. 'But I hope we shall get to know one another
better. When we do, I hope you will explain what happened at the end of your
song. For that little prank–––'
 'It was sheer accident!' interrupted Frodo.
 'I wonder,' said Strider. 'Accident, then. That accident has made your
position dangerous.'
 'Hardly more than it was already,' said Frodo. 'I knew these horsemen
were pursuing me; but now at any rate they seem to have missed me and to have
gone away.'
 'You must not count on that!' said Strider sharply. 'They will return.
And more are coming. There are others. I know their number. I know these
Riders.' He paused, and his eyes were cold and hard. 'And there are some folk
in Bree who are not to be trusted,' he went on. 'Bill Ferny, for instance. He
has an evil name in the Bree-land, and queer folk call at his house. You must
have noticed him among the company: a swarthy sneering fellow. He was very
close with one of the Southern strangers, and they slipped out together just
after your "accident". Not all of those Southerners mean well; and as for
Ferny, he would sell anything to anybody; or make mischief for amusement.'
 'What will Ferny sell, and what has my accident got to do with him?' said
Frodo, still determined not to understand Strider's hints.
 'News of you, of course,' answered Strider. 'An account of your
performance would be very interesting to certain people. After that they would
hardly need to be told your real name. It seems to me only too likely that
they will hear of it before this night is over. Is that enough? You can do as
you like about my reward: take me as a guide or not. But I may say that I know
all the lands between the Shire and the Misty Mountains, for I have wandered
over them for many years. I am older than I look. I might prove useful. You
will have to leave the open road after tonight; for the horsemen will watch it
night and day. You may escape from Bree, and be allowed to go forward while
the Sun is up; but you won't go far. They will come on you in the wild, in
some dark place where there is no help. Do you wish them to find you? They are
terrible!'
 The hobbits looked at him, and saw with surprise that his face was drawn
as if with pain, and his hands clenched the arms of his chair. The room was
very quiet and still, and the light seemed to have grown dim. For a while he
sat with unseeing eyes as if walking in distant memory or listening to sounds
in the Night far away.
 'There!' he cried after a moment, drawing his hand across his brow.
'Perhaps I know more about these pursuers than you do. You fear them, but you
do not fear them enough, yet. Tomorrow you will have to escape, if you can.
Strider can take you by paths that are seldom trodden. Will you have him?'
 There was a heavy silence. Frodo made no answer, his mind was confused
with doubt and fear. Sam frowned, and looked at his master; and at last he
broke out:
 'With your leave, Mr. Frodo, I'd say no! This Strider here, he warns and
he says take care; and I _say yes_ to that, and let's begin with him. He comes
out of the Wild, and I never heard no good of such folk. He knows something,
that's plain, and more than I like; but it's no reason why we should let him
go leading us out into some dark place far from help, as he puts it.'
 Pippin fidgeted and looked uncomfortable. Strider did not reply to Sam,
but turned his keen eyes on Frodo. Frodo caught his glance and looked away.
'No,' he said slowly. 'I don't agree. I think, I think you are not really as
you choose to look. You began to talk to me like the Bree-folk, but your voice
has changed. Still Sam seems right in this: I don't see why you should warn us
to take care, and yet ask us to take you on trust. Why the disguise? Who are
you? What do you really know about – about my business; and how do you know
it?'
 'The lesson in caution has been well learned,' said Strider with a grim
smile. 'But caution is one thing and wavering is another. You will never get
to Rivendell now on your own, and to trust me is your only chance. You must
make up your mind. I will answer some of your questions, if that will help you
to do so. But why should you believe my story, if you do not trust me already?
Still here it is–––'
 At that moment there came a knock at the door. Mr. Butterbur had arrived
with candles, and behind him was Nob with cans of hot water. Strider withdrew
into a dark corner.
 'I've come to bid you good night,' said the landlord, putting the candles
on the table. 'Nob! Take the water to the rooms!' He came in and shut the
door.
 'It's like this,' he began, hesitating and looking troubled. 'If I've
done any harm, I'm sorry indeed. But one thing drives out another, as you'll
admit; and I'm a busy man. But first one thing and then another this week have
jogged my memory, as the saying goes; and not too late I hope. You see, I was
asked to look out for hobbits of the Shire, and for one by the name of Baggins
in particular.'
 'And what has that got to do with me?' asked Frodo.
 'Ah! you know best,' said the landlord, knowingly. 'I won't give you
away; but I was told that this Baggins would be going by the name of
Underhill, and I was given a description that fits you well enough, if I may
say so.'
 'Indeed! Let's have it then!' said Frodo, unwisely interrupting.
 _'A stout little fellow with red cheeks,'_ said Mr. Butterbur solemnly.
Pippin chuckled, but Sam looked indignant. _'That won't help you much; it goes
for most hobbits. Barley,_ he says to me,' continued Mr. Butterbur with a
glance at Pippin. _'But this one is taller than some and fairer than most, and
he has a cleft in his chin: perky chap with a bright eye._ Begging your
pardon, but he said it, not me.'
 _'He_ said it? And who was he?' asked Frodo eagerly.
 'Ah! That was Gandalf, if you know who I mean. A wizard they say he is,
but he's a good friend of mine, whether or no. But now I don't know what he'll
have to say to me, if I see him again: turn all my ale sour or me into a block
of wood, I shouldn't wonder. He's a bit hasty. Still what's done can't be
undone. '
 'Well, what have you done?' said Frodo, getting impatient with the slow
unravelling of Butterbur's thoughts.
 'Where was I?' said the landlord, pausing and snapping his fingers. 'Ah,
yes! Old Gandalf. Three months back he walked right into my room without a
knock. _Barley,_ he says, _I'm off in the morning. Will you do something for
me? You've only to name it,_ I said. _I'm in a hurry,_ said he, _and I've no
time myself, but I want a message took to the Shire. Have you anyone you can
send, and trust to go? I can find someone,_ I said, _tomorrow, maybe, or the
day after. Make it tomorrow,_ he says, and then he gave me a letter.
 'It's addressed plain enough,' said Mr. Butterbur, producing a letter
from his pocket, and reading out the address slowly and proudly (he valued his
reputation as a lettered man):
 _Mr. FRODO BAGGINS, BAG END, HOBBITON in the SHIRE._
 'A letter for me from Gandalf!' cried Frodo.
 'Ah!' said Mr. Butterbur. 'Then your right name is Baggins?'
 'It is,' said Frodo, 'and you had better give me that letter at once, and
explain why you never sent it. That's what you came to tell me, I suppose,
though you've taken a long time to come to the point.'
 Poor Mr. Butterbur looked troubled. 'You're right, master,' he said, 'and
I beg your pardon. And I'm mortal afraid of what Gandalf will say, if harm
comes of it. But I didn't keep it back a-purpose. I put it by safe. Then I
couldn't find nobody willing to go to the Shire next day, nor the day after,
and none of my own folk were to spare; and then one thing after another drove
it out of my mind. I'm a busy man. I'll do what I can to set matters right,
and if there's any help I can give, you've only to name it.
 'Leaving the letter aside, I promised Gandalf no less. _Barley,_ he says
to me, _this friend of mine from the Shire, he may be coming out this way
before long, him and another. He'll be calling himself Underhill. Mind that!
But you need ask no questions. And if I'm not with him, he may be in trouble,
and he may need help. Do whatever you can for him, and I'll be grateful,_ he
says. And here you are, and trouble is not far off, seemingly.'
 'What do you mean?' asked Frodo.
 'These black men,' said the landlord lowering his voice. 'They're looking
for _Baggins,_ and if they mean well, then I'm a hobbit. It was on Monday, and
all the dogs were yammering and the geese screaming. Uncanny, I called it.
Nob, he came and told me that two black men were at the door asking for a
hobbit called Baggins. Nob's hair was all stood on end. I bid the black
fellows be off, and slammed the door on them; but they've been asking the same
question all the way to Archet, I hear. And that Ranger, Strider, he's been
asking questions, too. Tried to get in here to see you, before you'd had bite
or sup, he did.'
 'He did!' said Strider suddenly, coming forward into the light. 'And much
trouble would have been saved, if you had let him in, Barliman.'
 The landlord jumped with surprise. 'You!' he cried. 'You're always
popping up. What do you want now?'
 'He's here with my leave,' said Frodo. 'He came to offer me his help.'
 'Well, you know your own business, maybe,' said Mr. Butterbur, looking
suspiciously at Strider. 'But if I was in your plight, I wouldn't take up with
a Ranger.'
 'Then who would you take up with?' asked Strider. 'A fat innkeeper who
only remembers his own name because people shout it at him all day? They
cannot stay in _The Pony_ for ever, and they cannot go home. They have a long
road before them. Will you go with them and keep the black men off?'
 'Me? Leave Bree! I wouldn't do that for any money,' said Mr. Butterbur,
looking really scared. 'But why can't you stay here quiet for a bit, Mr.
Underhill? What are all these queer goings on? What are these black men after,
and where do they come from, I'd like to know?'
 'I'm sorry I can't explain it all,' answered Frodo. 'I am tired and very
worried, and it's a long tale. But if you mean to help me, I ought to warn you
that you will be in danger as long as I am in your house. These Black Riders:
I am not sure, but I think, I fear they come from–––'
 'They come from Mordor,' said Strider in a low voice. 'From Mordor,
Barliman, if that means anything to you.'
 'Save us!' cried Mr. Butterbur turning pale; the name evidently was known
to him. 'That is the worst news that has come to Bree in my time.' 'It is,'
said Frodo. 'Are you still willing to help me?' 'I am,' said Mr. Butterbur.
'More than ever. Though I don't know what the likes of me can do against,
against–––' he faltered.
 'Against the Shadow in the East,' said Strider quietly. 'Not much,
Barliman, but every little helps. You can let Mr. Underhill stay here tonight,
as Mr. Underhill, and you can forget the name of Baggins, till he is far
away.'
 'I'll do that,' said Butterbur. 'But they'll find out he's here without
help from me, I'm afraid. It's a pity Mr. Baggins drew attention to himself
this evening, to say no more. The story of that Mr. Bilbo's going off has been
heard before tonight in Bree. Even our Nob has been doing some guessing in his
slow pate: and there are others in Bree quicker in the uptake than he is.'
 'Well, we can only hope the Riders won't come back yet,' said Frodo.
 'I hope not, indeed,' said Butterbur. 'But spooks or no spooks, they
won't get in _The Pony_so easy. Don't you worry till the morning. Nob'll say
no word. No black man shall pass my doors, while I can stand on my legs. Me
and my folk'll keep watch tonight; but you had best get some sleep, if you
can.'
 'In any case we must be called at dawn,' said Frodo. 'We must get off as
early as possible. Breakfast at six-thirty, please.'
 'Right! I'll see to the orders,' said the landlord. 'Good night, Mr.
Baggins – Underhill, I should say! Good night – now, bless me! Where's your
Mr. Brandybuck?'
 'I don't know,' said Frodo with sudden anxiety. They had forgotten all
about Merry, and it was getting late. 'I am afraid he is out. He said
something about going for a breath of air.'
 'Well, you do want looking after and no mistake: your party might be on a
holiday!' said Butterbur. 'I must go and bar the doors quick, but I'll see
your friend is let in when he comes. I'd better send Nob to look for him. Good
night to you all!' At last Mr. Butterbur went out, with another doubtful look
at Strider and a shake of his head. His footsteps retreated down the passage.
 'Well?' said Strider. 'When are you going to open that letter?' Frodo
looked carefully at the seal before he broke it. It seemed certainly to be
Gandalf's. Inside, written in the wizard's strong but graceful script, was the
following message:
 _THE PRANCING PONY, BREE. Midyear's Day, Shire Year, 1418._
_Dear Frodo,_
 _Bad news has reached me here. I must go off at once. You had better
leave Bag End soon, and get out of the Shire before the end of July at latest.
I will return as soon as I can; and I will follow you, if I find that you are
gone. Leave a message for me here, if you pass through Bree. You can trust the
landlord (Butterbur). You may meet a friend of mine on the Road: a Man, lean,
dark, tall, by some called Strider. He knows our business and will help you.
Make for Rivendell. There I hope we may meet again. If I do not come, Elrond
will advise you._
 _Yours in haste_
 _GANDALF_.
 _PS. Do NOT use It again, not far any reason whatever! Do not travel by
night!_
 _PPS. Make sure that it is the real Strider. There are many strange men
on the roads. His true name is Aragorn_.
 All that is gold does not glitter,
 Not all those who wander are lost;
 The old that is strong does not wither,
 Deep roots are not reached by the frost.
 From the ashes a fire shall be woken,
 A light from the shadows shall spring;
 Renewed shall be blade that was broken,
 The crownless again shall be king.
 _PPPS. I hope Butterbur sends this promptly. A worthy man,
but his memory is like a lumber-room: thing wanted always buried. If he
forgets, I shall roast him._
 _Fare Well!_
 Frodo read the letter to himself, and then passed it to Pippin and Sam.
'Really old Butterbur has made a mess of things!' he said. 'He deserves
roasting. If I had got this at once, we might all have been safe in Rivendell
by now. But what can have happened to Gandalf? He writes as if he was going
into great danger.'
 'He has been doing that for many years,' said Strider.
 Frodo turned and looked at him thoughtfully, wondering about Gandalf's
second postscript. 'Why didn't you tell me that you were Gandalf's friend at
once?' he asked. 'It would have saved time.'
 'Would it? Would any of you have believed me till now?' said Strider. 'I
knew nothing of this letter. For all I knew I had to persuade you to trust me
without proofs, if I was to help you. In any case, I did not intend to tell
you all about myself at once. I had to study _you_ first, and make sure of
you. The Enemy has set traps for me before now. As soon as I had made up my
mind, I was ready to tell you whatever you asked. But I must admit,' he added
with a queer laugh, 'that I hoped you would take to me for my own sake. A
hunted man sometimes wearies of distrust and longs for friendship. But there,
I believe my looks are against me.'
 'They are – at first sight at any rate,' laughed Pippin with sudden
relief after reading Gandalf's letter. 'But handsome is as handsome does, as
we say in the Shire; and I daresay we shall all look much the same after lying
for days in hedges and ditches.'
 'It would take more than a few days, or weeks, or years, of wandering in
the Wild to make you look like Strider,' he answered. 'And you would die
first, unless you are made of sterner stuff than you look to be.'
 Pippin subsided; but Sam was not daunted, and he still eyed Strider
dubiously. 'How do we know you are the Strider that Gandalf speaks about?' he
demanded. 'You never mentioned Gandalf, till this letter came out. You might
be a play-acting spy, for all I can see, trying to get us to go with you. You
might have done in the real Strider and took his clothes. What have you to say
to that?'
 'That you are a stout fellow,' answered Strider; 'but I am afraid my only
answer to you, Sam Gamgee, is this. If I had killed the real Strider, I could
kill you. And I should have killed you already without so much talk. If I was
after the Ring, I could have it – NOW!'
 He stood up, and seemed suddenly to grow taller. In his eyes gleamed a
light, keen and commanding. Throwing back his cloak, he laid his hand on the
hilt of a sword that had hung concealed by his side. They did not dare to
move. Sam sat wide-mouthed staring at him dumbly.
 'But I _am_ the real Strider, fortunately,' he said, looking down at them
with his face softened by a sudden smile. 'I am Aragorn son of Arathorn; and
if by life or death I can save you, I will.'
 There was a long silence. At last Frodo spoke with hesitation. 'I
believed that you were a friend before the letter came,' he said, 'or at least
I wished to. You have frightened me several times tonight, but never in the
way that servants of the Enemy would, or so I imagine. I think one of his
spies would – well, seem fairer and feel fouler, if you understand.'
 'I see,' laughed Strider. 'I look foul and feel fair. Is that it? _All
that is gold does not glitter, not all those who wander are lost.'_
 'Did the verses apply to you then?' asked Frodo. 'I could not make out
what they were about. But how did you know that they were in Gandalf's letter,
if you have never seen it?'
 'I did not know,' he answered. 'But I am Aragorn, and those verses go
with that name.' He drew out his sword, and they saw that the blade was indeed
broken a foot below the hilt. 'Not much use is it, Sam?' said Strider. 'But
the time is near when it shall be forged anew.'
 Sam said nothing.
 'Well,' said Strider, 'with Sam's permission we will call that settled.
Strider shall be your guide. We shall have a rough road tomorrow. Even if we
are allowed to leave Bree unhindered, we can hardly hope now to leave it
unnoticed. But I shall try to get lost as soon as possible. I know one or two
ways out of Bree-land other than the main road. If once we shake off the
pursuit, I shall make for Weathertop.'
 'Weathertop?' said Sam. 'What's that?'
 'It is a hill, just to the north of the Road, about half way from here to
Rivendell. It commands a wide view all round; and there we shall have a chance
to look about us. Gandalf will make for that point, if he follows us. After
Weathertop our journey will become more difficult, and we shall have to choose
between various dangers.'
 'When did you last see Gandalf?' asked Frodo. 'Do you know where he is,
or what he is doing?'
 Strider looked grave. 'I do not know,' he said. 'I came west with him in
the spring. I have often kept watch on the borders of the Shire in the last
few years, when he was busy elsewhere. He seldom left it unguarded. We last
met on the first of May: at Sam Ford down the Brandywine. He told me that his
business with you had gone well, and that you would be starting for Rivendell
in the last week of September. As I knew he was at your side, I went away on a
journey of my own. And that has proved ill; for plainly some news reached him,
and I was not at hand to help.
 'I am troubled, for the first time since I have known him. We should have
had messages, even if he could not come himself. When I returned, many days
ago, I heard the ill news. The tidings had gone far and wide that Gandalf was
missing and the horsemen had been seen. It was the Elven-folk of Gildor that
told me this; and later they told me that you had left your home; but there
was no news of your leaving Buckland. I have been watching the East Road
anxiously.'
 'Do you think the Black Riders have anything to do with it – with
Gandalf's absence, I mean?' asked Frodo.
 'I do not know of anything else that could have hindered him, except the
Enemy himself,' said Strider. 'But do not give up hope! Gandalf is greater
than you Shire-folk know – as a rule you can only see his jokes and toys. But
this business of ours will be his greatest task.'
 Pippin yawned. 'I am sorry,' he said, 'but I am dead tired. In spite of
all the danger and worry I must go to bed, or sleep where I sit. Where is that
silly fellow, Merry? It would be the last straw, if we had to go out in the
dark to look for him.'
 At that moment they heard a door slam; then feet came running along the
passage. Merry came in with a rush followed by Nob. He shut the door hastily,
and leaned against it. He was out of breath. They stared at him in alarm for a
moment before he gasped: 'I have seen them, Frodo! I have seen them! Black
Riders!'
 'Black Riders!' cried Frodo. 'Where?'
 'Here. In the village. I stayed indoors for an hour. Then as you did not
come back, I went out for a stroll. I had come back again and was standing
just outside the light of the lamp looking at the stars. Suddenly I shivered
and felt that something horrible was creeping near: there was a son of deeper
shade among the shadows across the road, just beyond the edge of the
lamplight. It slid away at once into the dark without a sound. There was no
horse.'
 'Which way did it go?' asked Strider, suddenly and sharply. Merry
started, noticing the stranger for the first time. 'Go on!' said Frodo. 'This
is a friend of Gandalf's. I will explain later.'
 'It seemed to make off up the Road, eastward,' continued Merry. 'I tried
to follow. Of course, it vanished almost at once; but I went round the corner
and on as far as the last house on the Road.'
 Strider looked at Merry with wonder. 'You have a stout heart,' he said;
'but it was foolish.'
 'I don't know,' said Merry. 'Neither brave nor silly, I think. I could
hardly help myself. I seemed to be drawn somehow. Anyway, I went, and suddenly
I heard voices by the hedge. One was muttering; and the other was whispering,
or hissing. I couldn't hear a word that was said. I did not creep any closer,
because I began to tremble all over. Then I felt terrified, and I turned back,
and was just going to bolt home, when something came behind me and I... I fell
over.'
 'I found him, sir,' put in Nob. 'Mr. Butterbur sent me out with a
lantern. I went down to West-gate, and then back up towards South-gate. Just
nigh Bill Ferny's house I thought I could see something in the Road. I
couldn't swear to it, but it looked to me as if two men was stooping over
something, lilting it. I gave a shout, but where I got up to the spot there
was no signs of them, and only Mr. Brandybuck lying by the roadside. He seemed
to be asleep. "I thought I had fallen into deep water," he says to me, when I
shook him. Very queer he was, and as soon as I had roused him, he got up and
ran back here like a hare.'
 'I am afraid that's true,' said Merry, 'though I don't know what I said.
I had an ugly dream, which I can't remember. I went to pieces. I don't know
what came over me.'
 'I do,' said Strider. 'The Black Breath. The Riders must have left their
horses outside, and passed back through the South-gate in secret. They will
know all the news now, for they have visited Bill Ferny; and probably that
Southerner was a spy as well. Something may happen in the night, before we
leave Bree.'
 'What will happen?' said Merry. 'Will they attack the inn?' 'No, I think
not,' said Strider. 'They are not all here yet. And in any case that is not
their way. In dark and loneliness they are strongest; they will not openly
attack a house where there are lights and many people -not until they are
desperate, not while all the long leagues of Eriador still lie before us. But
their power is in terror, and already some in Bree are in their clutch. They
will drive these wretches to some evil work: Ferny, and some of the strangers,
and, maybe, the gatekeeper too. They had words with Harry at West-gate on
Monday. I was watching them. He was white and shaking when they left him.'
 'We seem to have enemies all round,' said Frodo. 'What are we to do?'
 'Stay here, and do not go to your rooms! They are sure to have found out
which those are. The hobbit-rooms have windows looking north and close to the
ground. We will all remain together and bar this window and the door. But
first Nob and I will fetch your luggage.'
 While Strider was gone, Frodo gave Merry a rapid account of all that had
happened since supper. Merry was still reading and pondering Gandalf's letter
when Strider and Nob returned.
 'Well Masters,' said Nob, 'I've ruffled up the clothes and put in a
bolster down the middle of each bed. And I made a nice imitation of your head
with a brown woollen mat, Mr. Bag – Underhill, sir,' he added with a grin.
 Pippin laughed. 'Very life-like!' he said. 'But what will happen when
they have penetrated the disguise?'
 'We shall see,' said Strider. 'Let us hope to hold the fort till
morning.'
 'Good night to you,' said Nob, and went off to take his part in the watch
on the doors.
 Their bags and gear they piled on the parlour-floor. They pushed a low
chair against the door and shut the window. Peering out, Frodo saw that the
night was still clear. The Sickle was swinging bright above the shoulders of
Bree-hill. He then closed and barred the heavy inside shutters and drew the
curtains together. Strider built up the fire and blew out all the candles.
 The hobbits lay down on their blankets with their feet towards the
hearth; but Strider settled himself in the chair against the door. They talked
for a little, for Merry still had several questions to ask.
 'Jumped over the Moon!' chuckled Merry as he rolled himself in his
blanket. 'Very ridiculous of you, Frodo! But I wish I had been there to see.
The worthies of Bree will be discussing it a hundred years hence.'
 'I hope so,' said Strider. Then they all fell silent, and one by one the
hobbits dropped off to sleep. 
